Your submission has been automatically removed because you are not allowed to post direct-links to profiles, please consider posting a collection of screenshots instead.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/VAC_Porn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
3 hits + 2 walks in 3 innings = 0 runs  Cardinals would be winning 6-0 against the Mets with those stats
Hey that sounds strangely familiar... 
thanks
Where do you think he would lie in a # placement?
http://www.artic.edu/aic/collections/citi/resources/342.pdf
Leviathan wasn't even supersonic during his attack on BB and speed of almost all Worm characters sucks.
We should just not allow them to discriminate. 
This makes a lot of sense. 
This is a serious question. How the hell are some rats so huge? I mean, you don't see other types of animals with such a large difference in size. Are there different breeds of rats, like there are dogs?   Fuck man. We're getting into Fallout sized rats here...a world with Fallout sized rats is not a world I'd want to live in.
Hey, that's awesome, good luck!
GT: Skull45101
Looks like one of those multi-lingual, Euro rednecks to me.
Holy shit, he did exceptionally well. Most people would choke under such circumstances, let alone respond with relevant, concise answers. 
I'm hatching for someone else right now. Ending this, I'll do it for you!
Yeah 6 inf recon isn't enough. I would try getting a second card of inf recon.
Trading assets that want out does not equal tanking. If both of them expressed not wanting to stick around then go ahead and trade them. But don't just give them away for late first round picks, get prospects or other NHL ready players in return. Trading away good players to get worse on purpose is ridiculous.
I agree.  Sure, there are players that are in it for the payday, but as bad as he was, I got the feeling that McGehee wanted to do well and enjoyed playing baseball.
Screw it bring Casey back. jk
You find?  I'm not finding it as captivating as the first season. I'm quite picky with shows but from the very first image of the first season I was hooked.  That said, I understand we're only 2 episodes in- I shall keep the faith. 
Oi!
When he was crucified. The people running the punishment did not view it has a sacrifice. It was report after by Jesus that it is was a sacrifice.
Amazing? He single handedly swept the 100 million dollar elite laker team vs the mavs and the thunder "pre Achilles" with his patented playoff choke jobs. Paul Pierce made more clutch shots in just this years playoffs than kobe has in the playoffs the last 20 Years 
for some reason i pictured ant-man inside a pingo doce bottle 
I tried it with my iPhone. Very poor results. What did I do wrong?
This person is out of touch with reality. I would bet significant amounts of money that whoever that person is has never met a gay person from that region.
I agree  they have all paled in comparison
I definitely don't control what is posted. Also, this is for entertainment. If people are able to entertain themselves in the way they're doing currently on this sub, I would like them to be able to continue doing that. In the end, its about people having fun.
When I read that first sentence I was expecting another lecture on how the robber was just misunderstood, and how the guy who stopped him was the real villain.  For once, I was peasantly surprised to be wrong. 
##I am a jew
What do you disagree with in the article?
They are probably netting ~$5,000 after all of those things which leaves them with monthly expenses of $3,000. Seems reasonable to me.
My friend Josh used to say  that "Every guy is gay after a couple drinks." That's when I learned that gay men can also be creepy and rapey.
Dks? 
It's not, really, or at least it shouldn't be. I assume the cultural background is something like:  * women are weak and must be protected by the men in their lives * men are strong and fight each other for sport (therefore able to take a punch) * it is not OK for a man to hit a woman because the man is naturally so much stronger than the woman * it is OK for a woman to hit a man because she is so weak it won't possibly hurt him seriously (or if it does, he needs to man up and get stronger).   It's a pretty absurd way of looking at the sexes but it seems still to pervade even today.
And remember the more money you lose, the faster you learn! :)
Wait... So you are saying that you don't play your disc because it's been nerfed too much. Please tell me that's not the case
Rekt
Spatial IO Compat
Find out where the illegal Mexican workers hang out when they are looking for day jobs and hang out there with them.
What are the best applications of **F-Droid**?
I've heard how unsanitary beards are and that may be the worst I've seen.
Yeah, Sony could fix their lack of exclusives though....
"I'd rather go to Azkaban."  -Sincerely the entire Northeast Corridor
Thats the fastest Inside the park HR I've ever seen. 
Finally, some fricken fire under our butts...
Gotta move your TH forward so the YoYo drops behind the string. Always ends wrapped around my NTH finger even when clean.
Well now I have to find that...  Even if he wrote Arkham Knight like that, it would probably have been similar to what we got. Their decision to not have boss battles, and everything else, was more of a gaming format decision. Not a writing/story one. So I don't think him leaving had that big of an affect on the final product format wise, which is what seems to be most people's issues. 
Was zum Teufel geht da ab? Tausche roaming Gebühren gegen netzneutralität. Spinnen die jetzt total? 
This thing, has been there for her little brother, by the sounds of it, most of his life, People carry on living even when their bodily dies, there's nothing scary about that.
Test this by sending it to yourself. Does the link become active?
Modern tabletop games... Just about anything you can find in /r/boardgames
I binged. [I binged so hard.](http://i.imgur.com/gqyzLn0.jpg) It felt so wrong, but so right.  Anywho, birthday's been cool so far, went and got that stuff a while ago and still haven't bothered setting it all up. Did some stuff with some friends a bit before and otherwise have just had a nice and relaxing day.
hahahaha genius
Can you imagine the fights on who gets bottom bunk?
Splash your face and soak your hair in cold water. Don't dry off.   You'll go to bed with wet dripping hair but it sorts you out proper. 
NHL 03 on the GameCube feels
No.
Kyra was unconvinced. *Korwyn is a man of ambition, true enough, but to teach even the smallfolk how to wage war? Surely the Velaryons are not be crazy enough to agree to that.*   "It is good to give the older members a purpose that is suited to them," Kyra agreed diplomatically. "Though the taste of war is too bitter for my tongue. I'd be very happy to visit though, should your goal come into fruition. It will be a boast to say I know the man who made it all happen." 
I love these short and sweet ones. When I click on a submission that has 245 images of poorly drawn MS paint figures building up an entire world with tons of characters and depth and lore just to get to a gif of a guy getting hit in the balls gets frustrating.
if you find yourself agreeing with the things being posted on this sub a lot, you should go get tested immediately. (IQ test I mean)
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CnmZ8HI8Yfw
I really dislike it when an article like that is hyped up by the media, but barely any follow up is done when the data is retracted, leaving everyone who only reads the news thinking what the article concluded was true!
Got my account on eBay banned a few years ago. I sold DLC for one day auctions for about 100 auctions in total over a year or two.  They'll eventually give you a warning and then the second offense they'll ban your account forever. Literally forever...
What to those tow things have to do with this?
Added!!
Well yes we can make the same justification, and human progress is all about new technologies surpassing and replacing old ones. No a BP oil spill is not a net positive, but it's not a fair comparison. Just stopping drilling would be the equivalent. I don't think the cows would be set loose (COW SPILL AHH), just the last ones killed and eaten, then they would fade into history.  Of course meat is delicious so I can't see this happening anytime soon.
This is so sweet 
Unfortunately, this post has been removed. Self posts should always have text in order to further expand on the title. Thank you!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/technology) if you have any questions or concerns.*
america is the greatest
100% coconut juice. Goya, Amy and brant, C2O, ONE, whatever looks good. I like the ones with pulp in them.  I can buy a case of 24 for ~$15-20, or buy them individually for 0.80-1.20 for 16oz.  
get em sally. sally salad fingers
How in the fuck did I never realize that was the Leah he was talking about?  My mind is blown.  I saw that first run 21 years ago and I never got that.
Gregory Campbell is terrible, Chris Kelly would make a lot more sense. 
Because if we had the same attitude about the tattoo thing then a lot of partners would still be wearing long sleeves
If I do hold out for dqxq subs or something, what do I look for? I don't know which god fests I should be rolling in specific. Also I have a max snow globe green, should I use it on dqxq or a green monster later ? 
I've considered the slide on camper approach but I'm worried about the effect of the extra weight on the off roading capabilities
LeMarkis Eldridge
2 goals down and 2 players injured, including their captain. Not looking good for Paraguay.
Waiting for Miami....
The US has an all-volunteer military, and has had once since the late 1970s. In the 1920s and 1930s, the US had a volunteer military; as it did from 1865-1917 and 1789-1862. From 1940 to 1975ish, and prior to that during the Civil War and WWI, citizens of military age were subject to conscription (forced service). Every conscript army has a core of professionals - officers and senior NCOs - while the bulk of the troops are provided by conscription. This is cheaper, since you don't have to induce anyone to join with attractive wages, and really the only viable means of assembling a large military. Volunteers are supposedly better motivated and are often better trained (due to having been in the military for years, in many cases, rather than a few months), but it's hard to get and keep enough of them. As a comparison, a Private (E-1) in the US Army today makes about $16,000 a year; his equivalent in WW2 made about $500 a month, inflation adjusted.
Your makeup is so on point 
I remember before the all-star break when there was all the debate over Korver making the team, there were arguments like "Korver is just a system player" and "he only looks good because he's surrounded by three all-stars", but really those arguments were far more applicable to Teague and Korver should have made the team way before Teague got on it.
added :)
He does?
Was it? I redact my statement, I guess.
Obongo? That's nice.
Only Amethyst was made in Kindergarten that we know of.
i didnt disagree with the trade, nor do i currently hold the opinion that budenholzer is a bad FO dude, but the criticism is more that payne was picked in the first place if he was going to be traded in the same season.  getting the pick back is actually a decent bit of business but who knows how long it will take to convey since it depends on the wolves making the playoffs in a tough western conference.
Vincent D'Onofrio could be their color guy!
Thank you
I haven't made time to type out my story, but I will soon 
i have everything i see here.  why do people act like its some fucking miracle that they can reproduce?  blehhhh, sickening. 
So you're EFS?  Man. I remember going there back when I made an account so I could lurk harder in nondefault subs. I went to all the shitty places, /r/cringepics especially, and thought it was all hilarious. Two years ago. It was a relatively decent place, but I stopped going to all those places because it really furthered whatever hell and depression I was going through at the time. /r/forwardsfromgrandma was a nice alternative, probably still is.   But now I go there and it's depressing, 'race realist' types spewing scientific racism get upvoted, TRP defense is common and TiA regulars are literally just 'SJWs' for white men. Or beyond that, contrarian for the sake of it because agreeing with any feminist point of view beyond CH Sommers is treason. They've turned into their very own worst enemy, with common views and goals and so on. 
imgur doesnt work
Ughhh I was gifted a $15 card for helping a friend move, and I really want to redeem it! Grr!
How's it feel being a peasant with only 30fps?
in court the jury will be shown a edited version, or the d.a. will argue not to allow it at all. 
Give me an example of a time where you told someone off for being stupid.
I acctually agree. Every Sci-fi series on books, movies, tv, or games now days seems to be zombies, post Apocalypse, showing the worst of humanity, the dirt and grime and how farm man can fall. There is nothing to lift us up and make us dream. No new stories of Fantastic Quests across strange lands with a group of loyal friends, or huge spaceships soaring though the air meeting new races and fighting interstellar wars.  Which sucks because i would rather have something to life me up and make me dream than something that would remind me how shitty people can be. But i feel like its our culture right now. The politics, economy, and environment is going to shite so that's whats in the concious mind and what people are writing stories based on. It feels like the end of Tommorrow Land where you learn that humanity is just stuck in a rut of seeing the worst and predicting the worst instead of dreaming and thinking of how to make it better. 
I didn't think you were insulting Eli I just wanted to dig out the one coherent thought OP had.  The play of the front four battling Brady and his historic offense all game is why I get annoyed when people say SB XLII was boring outside of the 4th quarter.
Not sure if it's the case everywhere but LVFT gear is pretty damn popular in SoCal 
More hard music would be good. Too much trap/future bass. I'm missing the 005 dubstep-type music. 
[Slusser](https://twitter.com/susanslusser/status/616022637043560450):  &gt; Sonny Gray is pretty sick. He spent the night at the hospital and is still there.  and  &gt; Melvin says he can't speculate on when Gray will go back into rotation given severity of his illness.  Flu can be pretty serious. Really hoping for a speedy recovery for Sonny, for his own sake as much as for baseball's.
You said you aren't racist, yet you blame the problems of an entire continent on black people, and the downfall of Detroit. 
Extremely unfortunate for Paraguay. I don't know if I've seen two players injured this early before 
At least Shelby has 6k through 3. #SilverLinings
My coworker broke up with her boyfriend so now I get to listen to her chat with clients about her burgeoning new sex life. Kill me now. Please.  OH MY GOD. She just told him how she's falling in love with a guy she met on twitter. I'm slapping her in my mind.  **Edit:** on another note, anyone watch the pilot for **Mr Robot**? I'm still undecided about whether I'm going to hate watch it...
Why did everyone sell their chars or did use them for power up o.o. every charakter i had was/is unique  My only fail at start was that i didnt reroll for good start units o.o (startet with haachi and gin
10/10 Porlpost
The first time you taste something is always the best, due to you having no standard to judge it by, and therefore often not disappointed.
[Devil in a New Dress by Kanye West](https://youtu.be/e8ejqE3ktFU)  -For the lazy.
http://www.baseball-reference.com/boxes/BOS/BOS201506140.shtml
In comparison canada was -55 at the time, a super baby.
Comment 6:  I just jerked off
I'm in firm agreement regarding suffrage.  55% is a big number.  I'd like to know your source so I can use it later.  In a democratic republic, holding a franchised majority is the very definition of power.  &gt;Men will be required to subsidize their freedom as long as women...continue to vote to take  This is an excellent point really. I'm not in total disagreement with your views.  Personally, I think a good tack is to patiently continue to highlight the inequities of spending, agency, and responsibility as dictated by the gendered majority.  I'd like to continue this discussion further but I've got other things to attend to.  I really appreciate your thoughtful response.  Thank you. 
I'll gladly take it when you move to pascal... 
Yay not even this patch fixed the half black screen
Anything is better than CODsofting. If you want the flash hider everything uses in BF4, it's an oversized VLTOR style compensator, like this: http://www.evike.com/products/52411/
[No](http://replygif.net/i/407.gif)
Downvote does not mean disagree, OP.
It's got teeth.
I'd be curious to hear your argument on that. 
I'll trade you for a gloom's trap or dungos. My trapsin is currently using Razortail so if I can sub out for anything more useful, I'd love to.
Having no sales tax can really effect a state's public works projects.
LOL oh look my harasser is defending me! LOL jesus fucking christ.
All of the above
Lucky man, looks damn good bouncing on your cock.
&gt; What is your allocation in small-medium-large and sector?  That is a good question... I'm afraid I don't have the answer to that. I would have to look up for that specific info. Is a portofolio focused on small capitalizations more likely to bigger drops (more volatile) ?
I just don't see how a Christian symbol or a Muslim symbol infringes on somebody's rights. 
What a disgusting, pasty, perfect human specimen
Don't agree there. They had a Top 5 in the world player carrying them and a bit of a magical run. And he's gone.   Liverpool hasn't finished better then 6th in the last 7 except that one year, so based on form that 2nd place is the exception not the norm. 
Given that most of the time the forum is down, I'd say you're lucky it even loads.
If you wanna be the silliest do it in a T9.
Correction: still barbaric and atrocious, but accepted by society.
:(
I feel like I have problems socializing as well. I already had the idea that I might suffer from Asperger's but maybe it's just because of my depression. Someone on reddit recommended the book **"How to Win Friends and Influence People"** by Dale Carnegie. It helped me understand how people act. It points out the obvious actually but now I often encounter social situations in which I think "it's covered in the book!" and "now I know why they/I act this way".
When a person with narcolepsy somehow manages to avoid a random fainting episode that prevents them from showing up to work, I think you can manage to do the same.
Why don't you start to volunteer for some kind of non-profit? Helping others is not only a great way to feel fulfilled, but you'll also be surrounded by nice people who will be more than welcoming to you! I promise you that. Don't be afraid to branch out and try something new that you never thought you would. Just do it. Find a place to volunteer and go. Help build a house for the less fortunate, play bingo with old people, go bowling with a bunch of divorced 50 year old dudes who just want to talk about life and do some bowling.   Don't settle for what you have. You can have so much more! 
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) 
We'll be making it rain if you need to cool down.
What makes you say that? Our recent managers' great success? Or are you just circlejerking
It's so appropriate that he made his campaign announcement from his old high school. His entire career seems like one big, clumsy attempt to become popular.
They nerfed devourer just for Warwick way back when and skrim ushers.
Most of us are super chill here no worries
No no no!!! It's the Spurs. The Evil Empire! They do not need any more help.
Hundreds, no... Thousands... MILLIONS... Let me explain myself It's Over 9000!(Millions)  Poppy is underrated, she can penta a 5 team katrina team without any item. While the enemy team has full build, all dragon buffs, baron and elixirs. There is a stereotype like with teemo, poppy is not bad, she is op while playing ap. I'm outta here. Of course: THere aren't poppy mains here because all of them are diamond I and are trying to face trolls, so they have no time to check reddit.
Yeah, I keep a bootable USB drive on my keys.
3-0 when I'm not here, SEE YA IN NOVEMBER!
Okay okay, jeez. All fast-food places are exactly the same and anyone that thinks differently is an inattentive doo-doo head. Got it.
"It was just awful... they found--" *horrified gasp* "--a plot hole!"
or more importantly not shootable by the cops
"It's just a flesh wound!"
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fbGkxcY7YFU
Finding lots of strays also means that there's an underlying problem in how people treat animals in the area? So if there aren't many, that means that people take care of their animals and aren't letting feral populations explode, nor do they dump unwanted cats. So in essence it's a good thing.
Is Rosalina only going to be Target.com?
Why not? I mean I liked the Commish as much as everyone else here, but he really doesn't do all that much. He wins faceoffs, but he doesn't play very much, and he does absolutely nothing offensively. I should also add we're paying him $3 Million a year for that. Korpi is younger and has much higher upside, and he's cheaper. He'll be good depth for our bottom 6 and can put up decent numbers. Chia has also said he wants to add another veteran player, so I imagine we'll be signing someone very soon.
&gt;a younger girl who wasn't in great shape  The thing is, she was just 125lbs at 5'7"! While it is possible that she wasn't exactly toned, that is still someone who is in good shape. If he cared about her building muscle and becoming healthier/fitter, losing 20lbs and getting her down to a BMI of **16** (yes, really) wouldn't have been the focus here.
Duuuuuuuude… right?
They can and do.
Oh, crap I forgot. It's been a while since I've read it, so I'm a bit shady on the detail/major plot points. Thanks for pointing that out.
The spacing between IN HER and KITCHEN was really distressing for a second.
What store were you at?  Follow up with them and see if they have security cameras.  I know most of the stores around here do.  **Also contact the following stores and let them know your collection was stolen so they can help you find it:**  Be There Games in Indian Trail.  (704) 628-7469.  Get Some Game in University.  (704) 728-5025.  Above Board Games in Fort Mill.  (803) 792-4786.  G2K Galleria in Rock Hill.  (803) 366-4263.  Your Local Game Store in Matthews.  (704) 729-4547.  Spandex City in Uptown.  (704) 909-7168.  Abubika Games in Gastonia.  (704) 671-2102.  Scott's Collectibles in Kannapolis.  (704) 784-2277.  Rebel Base Comics and Toys in Charlotte.  (704) 442-9660.  I'll also post this in the Charlotte MTG group on Facebook.  Most of the shop owners are in that group so hopefully they'll see it.    Also don't let this chase her out of the game.  If you guys play at Be There or Get Some, we'll probably run into each other at some point.  Let me know how I can help.  (I'm one of two "Alex's.")
I'm about to pull the trigger on these. http://m.basspro.com/Bass-Pro-Shops-SqueezeOut-Hook-Remover/product/10213376/  I've run into issue removing deep in the mouth treble hooks, and this looks easier to use than my pliers.  For bait I like yozuri pins minnow. The one around 2 inches lets me catch brim and bass.
No worries! I'm really hoping we can get to the bottom of this. I mean the easiest solution would be to buy a cheap dedicated GPU that works natively with OSX, but I don't want to ask you to do that when the internal graphics should be working.
Me neither (I live in Australia).
That makes me feel so much better about it! I suppose I was also seeking a bit of encouragement that other people had done similar things and it didn't end in disaster. Thanks!
They are immune probably because they do not threaten the commercial interests of reddit.
first time ever seeing a screen.yahoo link
Wow, that is a lot of detail. Very nice. Did you ever show it to your ex?
No, quite the opposite. If I eat something that seems questionable, making myself throw up sounds like a really good option. I never do it, but I do think about it.
[Unfinished comic that was based of a dumb joke I had](http://i.imgur.com/tT4fihn.jpg)
Ik denk dat ze het voor de documentaire hebben gedaan. Moedereend met haar pulletjes.
Laffy Taffy.
Seconding the reccommendatin, RTS is an incredibly rich resource. It's not *just* about spindling, it's packed with thoughtful info about yarn handling in general.
Lots of things can save a marriage. If a particular couple is just bored and they are starting to "itch" for some excitement, swinging can be a great way to fill that void. So can couples bowling, hiking, or tandem bicycle riding.   If a relationship has issues,  it's ignorant to believe that sex with other people will magically fix everything,  but if the issues are relating to sexual satisfaction,  intamcy, botedom, etc I can see how swinging might help.  My wife and I were getting bored of each other in the bedroom and we had almost stopped having sex altogether.  Cheating wasn't an issue but we both agree that with all things being equal it could have been in 3 to 5 years. Fix problems? No, but perhaps prevention against a very limited number of problems.  We communicate better now and we are both just a lot more fun to be around after being in the lifestyle. 
Not sure if this is a rare score or not, but I got this beauty in the mail today. I won it on eBay, and I was ecstatic to find I was still the highest bidder. It wasn't on discogs when I went looking for it, but it's come to me in NM-/NM condition.  The pressing is light, I'd say maybe a 120-gram on 2xLP. There's nothing special for the bonus 7" that came with it unfortunately, but that also means the inner gatefold retains its untouched glory. The 7" contains two extra cuts, Table Scraps and Mercury.  Honestly, this is an amazing album beginning to end, and while it was popular Lazy Eye was the only reason I listened to it in the first place. It's been a go-to album to feel good, pick me up, just make me smile. I don't have it attached to any memories, so every listen is just as pure as the first time. I'm incredibly glad I got this record, and rare or not I wanted to share it with you guys. :)
My girlfriends sorority sister gave Lebron a blowjob a few years back. She said it was salty. Edit: I'm 100% serious, I went to school in Ohio and she went to school at OSU. 
yet for some reason, still hot.
lol you wish bes!
Hating Reddit and its users is one of the most popular opinions here.
&gt; I got about 1670 calories for the full workout day  That must be... what, a 800kcal deficit? How the heck are you not feeling like shit all the time.
Eye test is relevant. It's a crucial part of analysis.   You are dunning-kreuger incarnate. 
&gt;I repped the Lions before Megatron  I'm so sorry. I offer you my condolences^^^^^as ^^^^^a ^^^^^Bears ^^^^^fan  &gt;I hate the Buckeyes with a passsion  Michigan fan, the last time my favorite college football team played yours, it ended 31-0! It's a shame that my team upgraded the schedule so that they don't play you guys anymore :P  We can agree on one thing, though: it's called **pop**
&gt; You will probably post again. You may get angry and start calling me names.  Even when I told you, you couldn't help yourself. 
Oh snap, Glen site staff shoutout!
Port saint Lucie, it's about two and a half hours southeast of Orlando. Lots of rivers and tributaries to explore but I feel like theres plenty of that in Florida lol
Yeah, I can see how that would make some moments in your life quite awkward.
(*checks*)  Weird, I don't seem to have uncontrollable urges to attack other people and/or rape. I must be doing this whole "being a man" thing wrong.
Public website with no specific focus where everyone willingly and openly lists a dossier's worth of their personal details is supposed to be a safe place. Kay.
That's honestly what I was expecting
Lol I saw that this morning. All good. I needed space on my roster anyway.
MastahRollas Youtube account is great and i tried the card technique a few times after watching some of his videos, but it doesn't really work for me. It's probably a little more diffuclt with a tip. I can roll joints without any special technique, but they aren't that tight. I might have to go back and try it a few times more.
He has a million+++ subs and people think hes a good CSGO model/person/influence etc.  However, it seems like he isn't at all. Which is why a lot of us care.
Apparently no one else does either. 
Smash it right now
hahaha can someone isolate jerry saying 'The freshest name in nuts'?
That looks so right. 
Your submission was removed because it looks like you're posting music without a correct title.   The correct format is:  **Artist Name - Song Name [genre]** (optional year) Optional extra text   Check your post now. Does it have spaces around the dash " - ", and does it have the [genre]?   Forgetting these points are almost definitely why it was removed.   An example of a correct title:     Damu the Fudgemunk - Tea Thyme [instrumental hip-hop/funk] (2010)    You will need to delete this post before submitting again (click on delete above).  ---  **If you are not posting music, please [message the mods](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMusic) to get approved!**   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Music) if you have any questions or concerns.*
the affidavit said. 
~~La amarilla a di maria fue cualquiera, no? El tackle fue limpio~~
What I love about this is the right wing have been using religion to push their agenda for decades, now theyre getting a taste of their own medicine. Religion should stay out of politics no matter which side its on.
Becaaaauuuuuseeeee.
Our core group contains a lesbian and some middle eastern guys. Hooray. My only prejudice is against squeakers. If they can play decent, great, but usually they just talk about stupid things, say stupid things, have stupid ideas. So it's not the age, it's the immaturity/ignorance that comes with being a squeaker I have issues with.
Regi is the bomb
Did anything break?
Audrey.........you framed yourself. Good job.
Stoner left on the eve of the introduction of the open categories and other changes to the sport, which were suppose to make it more appealing to the spectators and tv watchers. I think he's vision of an elite sport (which, let's face t, is still is) was prototype bikes, and factory teams...
Agreed. And there was speculation of substance abuse in his past.
I know he's not a pro but Drift0r does
You'd never be able to go to a Sunday brunch without hearing people counting how many drinks they had the previous night.
MAYBE LESLIE WAS IN RADLEY AND KNEW CHARLES   EDIT: I FUCKING CALLED IT SO HARD
&gt; stealing our money  You had no money until you started trading with us...literally centuries ago, and up until this doucherat decided to start an assault on the country.  &gt;actively hunting our men  The terrorist trying to take over the province?  &gt;shunning our gods  Do *you* ever talk about Kyne, Stuhn, Tsun, Juhnal, or Mara? Because Talos is *our* god, shit, he's a god of *men* not exclusively nordic men. Cry about Shor or Ysmir if you want to be authentic.  &gt; abandoning the land  Is that why we're trying/easily fighting off the king killer and his cult of personality?  &gt; Us Nords could definitely govern our own land fine  Hell literally opened up on the land during the *Oblivion Crisis*, and you were still having a war just cause.   &gt;secure our roads and eliminate the bandits if given the chance  So could we if you didn't start eating up the kool aid and forced us to divert resources to a civil war.
[yeah fuck Robben](http://mexico.cnn.com/media/2014/11/10/la-controversial-jugada-en-la-que-rafael-mrquez-marc-al-atacante-holands-arjen-robben-en-octavos-de-final-del-mundial-de-brasil-2014.jpg)
Or anybody whose paycheck is tied to profits
If I were to guess the reason for having a standing military in peace time, I'd say it's the same reason footballers practice in the off-season and have skirmishes with each other waiting for the real games to begin. Practice like your second, play like you're first.   Why we support our military? We are the world super power. We need to defend our interests at home and abroad, and the best way to do that is to project power over the entire world. And for a bit we did ok. But those in charge have realized the potential for wartime economy boosts, and the necessity of oil for our economy, for now. So we take on vague causes like "war on terror" and have ourselves some off season skirmishes that we also happen to get paid for. We occasionally overthrow some dictatorships the CIA set up during the cold war in favor of democracies, so for that we have to believe that what we are doing is just, if not easy.  Tl;dr: Private lower class didn't decide to invade Iraq/Vietnam/Afghanistan on his own, but he did sign up to defend the United States while the rest of us got on with our lives. Made something of himself/herself, did something hard, bettered themselves, gained marketable skills to bring into society, and will possibly have to die. 
In no particular order.  1. horrible Water Gardens fight.  2. Gray Worm's "I dunno man."  3. Gray Worm's conversation with Missie when he wakes up.  4. That one time Jon Snow did his -_- face (also known as every Jon Snow scene.  5. "We must rescue Theon." "K nvm."
Yup.
&gt; gumption   But gumption is the most important part!
Damn we really could have cashed in there.
Chicharito to Atlanta United. Loan him back to Real Madrid/Man U until 2017. 
PeterLicht - Sonnendeck  https://www.tape.tv/peterlicht/videos/sonnendeck  Letztes Mal zwar schon vorgeschlagen, aber das war ein bisschen knapp, so einen Tag vorher..  Ist vielleicht ein bisschen ruhig, aber vielleicht findet man ja ne passende Stelle in der Playlist dafür. Wäre bestimmt schön für alle, die so zwischen 25-30 heute sind und sich noch an Viva Zwei erinnern, die werden das bestimmt kennen :)  Bessere Qualität: https://soundcloud.com/peterlicht/sonnendeck
If it's precision engineered weight gainer, that stuff is disgusting
While market-state constructs might ultimately replace some elements of contract law and arbitration, the recent financial crisis showed a lot of the gaps in the process where the very same auditing companies that were supposed to be quality checking bonds, and the insurance companies that were supposed to be acting as hedges against risk both were insufficiently doing their jobs.  It then fell to the nation-states to re-capitalize the banks and prop up the insurance companies.  Had a fixed currency like bitcoin been underpinning the crisis, any fractional reserve banking would have collapsed, and without the threat of jail time, few if any of the banks would have bothered to settle any lawsuits.  Basically, while there are plenty of money and resources going around, anarcho-capitalism works just fine.  When the shit hits the fan, those who control the army ultimately make the rules.  A private firm would do a terrible job of guaranteeing rights for those in poverty, and I fail to see how you could have a market-state without essentially turning the poor into slaves after they have run out of money to pay for their civilian insurance.
In! Time to start life
Wartortle! Also added ^_^
After 9 hours, 340 points and 171 comments, only a single guy have pointed out that the headline is misleading in the sea of 'jokes' and outrage over the headline. Good job /r/worldnews.
I really would have thought "I'm asking for a friend" would have tipped you all off that I wasn't being serious, especially since I asked "Where can **I** buy some meat", but hey you all get a B- for getting most of the weird rules about grey market account/meat sales stuff right. 
I was thinking more that it's suspicious that it's happened in places she lives/lived. (Friends, Connections, and distractions)
Got it!! Thank you so much!! :D
It's google translated from the first article.  Here's the info in the yellow box in the 2nd article.  Le Trung Tuan 10 years old, his face appeared a tumor and spread from the mouth to the forehead.  The tumor occupies almost the entire face, pushed sideways eye, mouth and nose area that deflected disfigured face completely. Not only that, it also causes a compression of Tuan dimmed eyes, deaf in one ear.  More dangerous, after 4 years the tumor has destroyed  part of the skull, frontal sinus, deep into the skull base, put pressure on the optic nerve and pituitary gland affects a serious threat to life.  The family gave Kids visit many places but the doctors shaking their heads.  Fortunately then, c Gia world tumor McKay McKinnon agreed free surgery for Tuan. Surgery was performed on the day 23.07.2013.  Le Trung Ha, Tuan's father said recently he take me to the test at the International Hospital VIMEC (Hanoi). Doctors discovered ghosting in the tumor has been removed. The hospital had sent the results to the USA for g IAO Professor McKay McKinnon and awaiting conclusion. "The family is also a little worried, but seeing his son will get better over for the pleasure of going back to school is satisfied so long," he Ha said.
imo, the hate for Gauss Barrel is justified, but a lot of the reasons for it are not.  My personal reason for believing Gauss Barrel sucks is that it's such a *marginal dps increase* for the *risk* required to use it. The *very moment* you're forced to cancel a cast for whatever reason, it's an immediately dps loss and you're doing less damage than you would've without Gauss Barrel.  While on paper, Gauss Round+Ricochet and the 20% overall skill damage increase should make up for the lack of autoattacks, it clearly doesn't.  It's not to say that Gauss Barrel should *always* be a dps increase even  if you mess up. It's just that the effort:reward ratio of using it right now is so pathetically low, there's no real reason to stress yourself to keep it on.
Is there a rank limit for students? Or are all elos eligible.
The state would have to change its Constitution, which aint gonna happen.
I have been watching a lot of Cheers lately and in one episode Coach is trying to help Sam study, so he comes up with these "mnemonic device" songs. One of them is (sung to the tune of 'When the Saints Go Marching In') "Albania...Albania...you border on the A-dri-atic"  I got the clue about Albania right due to this. I guess mnemonic devices do work! Thanks Coach!
you put it into good words, maybe this is what people try to articulate when they say she is weak. But is that so different from when Nami stabs her arm, breaks down crying and asks Luffy for help? 
Whatever helps ya sleep at night, Brucie. 
Well, you delivered. So well done! 
I got the email from the campaign today, and finally buckled down and made my contribution.  I had $33 to my name, but I am happy to put $10 to support Bernie.  Last night I brought him up with my mom, and she hadn't heard of him at all. Gave her a brief bio, some campaign talking points, and she said she would look into him. Plant those seeds, keep campaigning, keep building and sharing enthusiasm.  If you haven't contributed yet, today is definitely the day!!
There's no such this as dog hormones you dumbass.   Heres how being trans works.  In the womb, a baby is female by default. It gets hormones to masculinize its body and its brain, or none. Trans women (MtF) exist because only their body got masculinized. Trans men (FtM) exist because only their brain got masculinized.
Much worse news than we expected. So she's severely anemic. Like her red blood cells are very very low. They should be at 30, unhealthy is 20, and she's at a 13. Which explains why she can't eat. She's negative for feline AIDS and Feline lukemia, but it very well may turn into lukemia soon.   The Vet was like "look I can do all these tests, give her a blood transfusion, all these things. It's going to cost thousands of dollars and you're a very young couple and may not have the money and you've had the cat for two days. My suggestion is you give it back to the person you got it from and see if their vet can help, and see if she still needs milk from her mother to get better. But honestly... She's a kitten and sometimes they die and I think that's what we are looking at, no matter how much help you give her."   He was a very honest and open doctor and explained a lot to us.   So we met the woman and are giving kitty back. I'm very glad the doctor was honest, but my girlfriend and I are pretty torn up. Hopeful that she gets better but we're being realistic.   Thank you all for your help!
Better that than the NC ghost zerging deserted continents during prime time alerts on Connery. 
Long and fast or long and slow
&gt; How you uh, how you comin' on that novel you're working on? Huh? Gotta a big, uh, big stack of papers there? Gotta, gotta nice little story you're working on there? Your big novel you've been working on for three years? Huh?Gotta, gotta compelling protagonist? Yeah? Gotta obstacle for him to overcome? Huh? Little story brewing there? Working on, working on that for quite some time? Huh? Yeah, talking about that three years ago. Been working on that the whole time? Nice little narrative? Beginning, middle, and end? Some friends become enemies, some enemies become friends? At the end your main character is richer from the experience? Yeah? Yeah?&gt; 
Awesome art style!
"Can you settle for reincarnation?"  "Yes"  "Go ahead, then."
What, christen the all grain setup with a zero all grain beer?
I'm at a large university in Southern California, but many of the guests I encountered were from Tennessee
Longest killing spree, #21, top %1, 44 kills  Best single game (salvage) score, #157, top %1, 7,040 points  And just being top %3 division (skirmish) is really nice.  (Proof http://destinytracker.com/destiny/playlists/ps/shingen-c/lockdown )
I'd recommend going to SD tactical arms
no, there is indeed a difference quite obviously  and I would argue that it isn't equally as racist  but again, I'm not saying its not offensive
That was so dumb.... I loved it!!  
Committed. 
Why does the MHP hate the AKP? They're both right wing parties.
[Feels good](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/006/077/so_good.png) 
[Here you go...](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rGfDXMnQw7g)
Ocean County here too!  I wish I could meet up with you but not this weekend!   A wool walk sounds like a great idea. 
It's what was known as a 'kafa kağıdı' or 'kimlik'. Like today's ID cards.  The headings are: İsmi ve şöhreti (name and what he's known for)   Pederi ismiyle mahalli ikameti (fathers name and where he resides)   validesi ismiyle mahalli ikamet (mothers name and where she resides)   Tarih ve mahalli veladeti (date and place of birth)   Milleti (nationality)   san'at ve sıfat ve hizmet ve ittihab salahiyyeti (roughly what his occupation or profession is)   Mute'ehhil ve zevcesi müteaddit olup evlediyyeti (if he has wives, if he has more than one, if he has kids)   Derecat ve sunufu askeriyyesi (what degree or rank of military he's in) 
Their shipping is usually high, hate to see it on a 40+ lb box.
I'm sorry, what's a symlink? 
any one got a name on this chick?gorgeous.
One time, I flashed to secure my crab from a Sion who knocked it away, missed the smite, lost it, then fought the Sion and died. I don't know why, but I felt like the fate of the entire game rested on me getting that crab and I couldn't give it up until I died and realized how dumb what I had just done was. Luckily, everyone thought it was funny, so there was no rage.
**Long it may be, but it's not exactly "good".**  The Gottman stuff is complete crap (and I do mean *complete* crap -- doesn't even qualify as a "prediction" equation).   Go read this -- http://www.slate.com/articles/double_x/doublex/2010/03/can_you_really_predict_the_success_of_a_marriage_in_15_minutes.html -- before you swallow this butt-kissing grad students little over-the-top paean to "psychometricians".  ---  Also, then if you have the time, go a read this one too: http://www.theguardian.com/science/2014/jan/19/mathematics-of-happiness-debunked-nick-brown  THEN, after consuming that -- and pay attention to the IMPORTANT key little parts, like the statements from and about psychologists and math (which /u/GuildedCasket makes so much of), to wit:  &gt;&gt;**John Gottman, a leading authority in the psychology of successful relationships, wrote to Losada because he couldn't follow the equations.** "I thought it was something I didn't know about, because he's a smart guy, Losada. He never answered my email," he says. Gottman also wrote to Fredrickson. "She said she didn't understand the math either."  &gt;&gt;"Not many psychologists are very good at maths," says Brown.
"Is that a problem?" *He asks with a slight laugh.*
You've got a good point, but is he really considered a good worthy player since his injury anymore? And yeah the harsh truth is, when our players get loaned out, they never come back from it the majority of the times, and that worries me.
Investment bankers, the corporate finance guys, are complete assholes. Egos through the roof ( the stories I could tell ugh)
Thanks! I don't consider myself famous, so i don't regret it. 
[Rogue System aka DCS Spaceship](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vziIgAtD66s)  Now get this and be comfortable knowing you could fly a real spaceship!
€1.6bn, apparently.
uj/ Your flair has made my evening./rj   Don't do it. You're wasting his talent if you eat a vegetable. Respect his meat skills.
OK, you've just given me nightmares for a week.   Just for that,  President Sarkeesian in 2020.
they are making up for the shit services they have
Ted Cruz has been a 14 year old who thinks he's figured out everything since he was 12.
Everyone there should be castrated. 
This is literally the worst. Also last time I added someone from CS they proceeded to get "drunk" and try to send me their nudes. :(
Hello, thanks for dropping by in my AMA! I was actually really hyped when we killed them 2v2, it felt like a pretty momentous play in the game (although it ended up not really being that huge in the grand scheme of things)  The most stressful thing is the struggle of trying to improve. You set expectations for yourself constantly, and when you fail to meet them, it becomes increasingly difficult to keep at it. The most enjoyable thing i would imagine is winning and watching all the work you put in pay off, but i haven't really done that in a while XD
What's your guess?
&gt; implying I don't exclusively fuck cored, std-free fruit 
Guilty spark was a human at the time of Bornstellar becoming Iso-Didact.  And Iso-Didact kinda had a thing with the Librarian.
lollipops are awesome and they look fun on you. you can flick them around in your mouth and stuff!  also delicious AND cheap.
not all of us
Look back at the resident and say  "A. B. C."  Throw on a pair of heavy tint sunglasses, drop the suctioning cath on the floor and walk out without looking back.
Very helpful comment, thx!
Then why the fuck do you look so ugly?
I had no idea. The controls aren't very obvious. Maybe I'll give it another try.
Seriously, people honor their dead by naming their children after them all the time. The only problem here is that she hid it, knowing it would upset her fiance.
Also, why are you asking about whether people have met Kobe or *LeBron*? Like why would you associate the two with one another? Kobe is the greatest player of the millennium, LeBron is arguably one of the better players in the league today. Kobe is an all-time great, LeBron will be an afterthought in NBA history.  I think a better thread would ask if we have met Kobe or Jordan, or Kobe or Magic...essentially, players of similar caliber. Let's not buy into media hype and kid ourselves into thinking LeBron is on their levels. It's not healthy.
IPv4 + TSSF = happy vaper with happy ears. 
yep. still on
I'm always charming, I'm just more direct and suggestive while drunk.  Yep..... next one......... Oh fuck, Marine bar *barely glances at the menu and orders a whiskey then leaves* How many bars will we go through............
Well, sure. But he absolutely owns this one role.
Oh man I forgot we hadn't played the Phillies yet. That's fun
That does it!  The downfall of the Confederate flag, the preservation of ACA federal subsidies, expansion of gay marriage rights, reaffirmed voting rights, resurrected abortion clinics, reduced gerrymandering, mandatory vaccinations, and now this. The "end of times" is definitely upon us.  Thanks Obama.
What about a kid?
People already starts with hog 2 when they want (I do that most of the times myself).
Haha.  "I don't want him negotiating because gif"?  Excellent example of GOP arguments against nothing.  You parody the GOP iodicy so well. What inspired this character?  Like Colbert was based off Bill.  Is Markloss a Sarah Palin inspiration?  
Whoa there buddy, calm down. See these patch notes: http://na.leagueoflegends.com/en/news/game-updates/patch/patch-313-notes
"I feel like I'm playing who framed Roger Rabbit and I'm Roger Rabbit" Audrey to Austin 4:58 cam 3
what mainland? Japan chased the British out of south east Asia and the British were in full retreat in back to India. 
When you pick out the bag you want, look it up on eBay. There's plenty of "fell off the back of the truck" backpacks being sold there for a fraction of the retail price. 
Mr. Brown, regarding Asia, in his closing at the 2012 PCR:  &gt;Your Honor, we tried -- and I submit, as an officer of the court, Your Honor, has granted a certification in which we attempted to get her here. For whatever reason, she evaded service in Oregon
that sounds uncomfortable.
&gt; Calling me stupid right off the bat.  You tried to discredit the source by saying it was "dumbed down" while avoiding and deflecting the point of the article itself. Sounds like a pretty weak and/or stupid defense.   &gt; Did you read the article?  yes, actually - and it doesn't even back up your point. Did *you* read it? The article points out many "perks" that higher-income businesses are providing their employees - tech and consulting companies, namely. This is directly counter to your claim that low-and-medium-skill workers are receiving a trend of higher benefits - which is patently false.   And what you're referring to is the **skills gap** - which I've already pointed to.  once again, you're logically incoherent and have no consistent argument. I pointed out that low and middle skill jobs are disappearing from our economy. You respond with a Forbes article highlighting the skills gap - which is exactly my point.   &gt; It's a trend as more &amp; more employers are doing it.  You still have no evidence for your claim of a "trend," nor do you seem to know what a statistically significant "trend" is.   &gt; Oh look, more baseless accusations  You're the one so easily offended by my pointing out that you haven't studied Political Economy. 
At that point I'd run to the first darkness room and die. Even if I don't get the bounty. Die then leave. What strike was it?
Cats do their own thing, that's the awesome thing about them. Feeding and taking care of the litter are the only things you'd need to worry about. Pet them and play with them as much as you like. If you don't, they don't care. They'll entertain themselves, siblings especially.  Also backing what fourth_letter posted, they're really resilient. They'll get themselves stuck in tight spaces all the time, fall off tables and other furniture while sleeping. They don't care.
I think the main reason is 144 is 48*3 so it works much better with 3D films where each eye recieves 3 frames vs 2-3 for 120Hz.
This is fake. Your profile is male. Please take this down. It's insulting to this community.
Congratulations is fuckin great man.
All people that support the flag say it's a "southern" thing... that it's not about race.  Well, explain to me why I never see a black person from the South supporting that flag then??  There are plenty of african-american people born and raised in the south.. and I have never seen one of them.. either in person or interviewed on TV saying, "I really don't see what the big deal is..." or "it's not about race, it's a southern thing"..  please explain why that is. 
Could a woman do it with one hand while facing the back of the bra though? I'm sure they've gotten it down to a fine art with both hands behind their back, but the change in perspective might dick things up. I don't even know how easy I could do it, I'm used to reaching around my girlfriend while kissing her
Gangs have a propensity to hit innocent bystanders in drive-bys. I knew a guy who got killed by a gang member. Gangs also tend to rob rural areas not far from their main cities seeking weapons as it's easier to rob a house than a gun store. I don't live far from Saginaw which has many a gang member.
This is pretty awesome! After reading through the post and giving it another listen, I have to agree with some of the other comments. Tempo is a little fast and light for trip hop (still a good track just maybe not trip hop) and some of the samples didn't quite fit. The countdowns were alright I think but there was one around the 30 second and one at the 3 minute mark that didn't quite fit. Anyways, good tune. I'd love to here more from you!
Skyrim
There have been a couple egregious ref mistakes here. More that they're the same player stacked, and nothings happening
Oh my god, It's Jeff the Killer Animatronic!  Just look at that smile, the unblinking eyes! IT'S A MATCH!
i don't get it.. i have had mine since January, don't use a case, use it every day and have no dirt or fibers sticking out.. mine is perfect... i toss mine around, my 15 month old son grabs it then runs away often dropping it... still looks new.
I wish I could, but it's an old one from either arfcom or /k/, I don't remember which.  Also, I hate Glocks.
That's called a flogger. 
Yeah, I think maybe a couple of people perhaps misunderstood what I meant but that's okay, it's sometimes hard to get the right tone/meaning just from text.  But yeah, I meant the occasional change for at most one song.  It would just change things up a big here and there, and the fans seemed to love it when they have done it in the past. 
Okay, not to nitpick, but does this artist even know where a butthole is located on the human body? This comic says to me "Comcast is like bruising your tailbone with a pickle."  Which I guess is also accurate.
I really try, but I can never finish an entire bunch of spinach before it starts to get soggy and icky.
Join the Alliance. Plenty of trading and combat to be done. And it's not as much like herding cats as other factions I hear.
I'm ready for some pre-season 6/Charles questions to be answered.... Here's to hoping!
&gt;so it's not possible for your mention of classes to be in response to my comment about heightened scrutiny  You have it exactly backwards. I asked about suspect classes in response to your remark about equal protection, and YOU RESPONDED with a remark about "heightened scrutiny." I did not mention classes in response to your remark about "heightened scrutiny." Afterward I responded to your remark that "heightened scrutiny" was not applied in this case.
The dude isn't some bum, he just hasn't started since Joe is unbreakable. He's practiced against some of the best defensive players to play their positions, every day. I'm not saying he's the guy that will take you to a SB on his own, but he's good enough to help a good team sneak into the playoffs. At the very least contend for a WC.
&gt;AAS Quoi? As in the Anabolic steroid? CPAP? Fancy - we cant do that. Do you get Mag sulfate too? Not that we can, but in 3 years on car I've only assisted CPAP once, but Mag a whole bunch of times. I really would like a decent pain med, but feel opiates aren't a likely option (A good chunk of EMTs would totally steal them). The best solution would be the "[green whistle](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Methoxyflurane)" that Australians use. A NSAID that works fantastically. Versed would be wonderful - easily 80% of my patients are benzo-deficient
Fine, I'm taking the quiche I made you and going home.
"Surprise you? You'll have to give me some time to think then."  *He chuckled.*
how do you see twitch banned words?
Yeah that's a really good question.
Sweet. Thanks.
This is a fake news site in French, like The Onion.
I was actually surprised that the Knights had more Saturdays than Sundays. Definitely feels like they play every Sunday.
I'm so not at that point where doing anything is fun without cigarettes. It's really not nice to sit outside without a cigarette... at least not yet... I quit in April and I must say, sticking to my diet is so much easier.
As long as you don't sand through the finish it should work fine. 
You might actually be a pedophile if you are that delusional about thinking that everyone sees you as one... dude people are not looking at you and think "Oh my gawd, that guy, he's got to be pedophile because he doesn't have a ring on his finger at 32yrs old" wtf is this post even about!?  Now that I think about it, you're just full of shit. I bet none of what you said is true, you're just whoring for karma. I don't know how I know it but I know it.
Shouldn't cleverbot have become more clever over the years?  
Hey it's you! *Haaha*
4485 3989 8964 6082  please respond
Just as an aside, I'm using Nova and Google Now is mapped to holding down the home button on my phone
I disagree with the notion that in order for criticism to be valid the critic must provide a fleshed-out alternative. Suggestions for avoiding or expanding upon something are sufficient in my opinion.  If this is about what I said, well, first thing is I was very careful to avoid suggesting that the writing was bad. I loved what was there. If I thought the writing was bad, I really wouldn't be here as ridiculously frequently.  But I do concede that there are aspects that could have been improved.   I think the relationship could have more explicitly tapped into the larger themes of the series or books. I wish they could have delved more into the theme of modernity and tradition, and where Asami and Korra fit into that picture. A central part of every book that the Avatar's role and the age she finds herself in are often at odds. And also, I just wanted to see more Asami. Even considering time and budget constraints, I think more could have been done. For instance, giving Asami her own thread to narrate in Remembrances, focused over the time in the desert together, would have been better.  I could go on, but this is exactly the main problem I have with the resurgence in criticism, valid or not. The threads on Friday were a fun celebration of the great real-world event. I can't help but feel that dredging up these debates now, regardless of the quality, is slightly suspect.
Most fruits and veggies. I go to a store with the intention of eating healthy,  and end up chucking it all when it turns into soup in the veggie drawer
Just use a blank photo or a photo of a cartoon or something. Make your name not your name obviously. But do be careful if you go around other gay guys or people you might suspect cause if they have grindr too they can see exactly how far away you are. And it's pretty obvious you have the app when it says "name is 5 ft away". And you are 5 feet away from him.
Was he asking for java code specifically? This is definitely answerable in pseudocode
I know I know. I was so surprised when I saw it in the result screen and my platoon mate was laughing because he had died 1 second before the end of the game, thus giving it to me.  It just doesnt feel right. My other one, I worked for it. And I normally dont play assault thus making it even more weirder and not feeling deserving.
**Thoughts On Ushi**: I love him, a very entertaining and informative youtuber, his collabs with Milko and his friends are hilarious  **Thoughts On Milko**: I love him too, but not as much Ushi though, very nice guy, I think he needs to talk a little more in his more informative videos  **Thoughts On Protoscope**: I used to like him, but he's become more aggravating to watch, his views on himself,I'm not too keen of  **Thoughts On Dabearsfan**: .....  I'm not too keen on him either, I think he's too awkward to watch, and his laugh really makes feel uneasy, I think his videos have become very monotone and boring compared to his old self. I also disagree with his hate on Guardian and Oracles, but people are entitled to their own opinions though.  **Thoughts On Respawn**: I loved him, too bad he's gone now  **Thoughts On LeonZai**: I hate him
Thanks, I wasn't aware of any technical issues...after borderlands, these things are good to know!
It was a pain, but it required installing from the Amazon App Store. After, the currency option will show up properly. Make sure to uninstall the Google Play version. 
I'm not sure, I suppose with the right type of magnet (strength-wise/similar to the heads when recording) would cause some corruption. 
Idk I don't smoke that stuff but I would imagine it would work...
You're just being crazy combative, I prefer fWAR, sorry. 
What of you risk getting beaten for not looking like the gender whose bathroom you are going in?
its ok it is from cum crossfire 2.   all good i watch so much fucking porn on a daily basis that i forgot that CC was in ... uh... CC2.  ;) now that i see the cover i realized i DL'd that one, the sheena one and the one with the return of Kaylani Lei as well.  (who's doing nice anal scenes now when she never used to!)
This Referee wants to give a card for everything.
These are really solid budget performers. I helped my little brother build his first computer with the FX-6300 and we got it up to 4.5 Ghz on a cheap CM Hyper 212 Evo and a $110 990FX board.  The only way downside is that the upgrade path is not really there when compared to Intel's budget options that allow you to plop in an extremely quick Core i7.
This was one of mine.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CLguCUMi4BQ
You don't know it was a joke towards the opening.   Are you ready?  I'm lady!
A fair assessment. Btw who downvoted us?
No need to thank me at all.  --- OOC: So this is something that Marnie will love only problem is ther won't a picture for it. So I'll just describe it at the time :D
Sandwichmixto. Xbox One. PST. I'm down to play whatever! I can't find anyone who uses their mic and its frustrating as hell! Why does nobody use their mics or talk in chat? Is there some sort of team chat or what? :(
http://i.imgur.com/RVFAn8R.png
Its nowhere near this level when any other team plays...
What a red herring...
We will. Please take care of Saader for us. 
Well i don't really like buying used. Just a personal preference
This is perfect OP thanks a bunch
was that her case? or was it that she wanted to live like any 17 yo but had it in her head that she didn't want this kind of (only kind of) treatment?  it's one thing is she is choosing death no matter what.  another if she's choosing it because she got hung up on a word.
Ok, maybe this explanation will make more sense to you.  The 1st Amendment protects "speech" (more accurately, expression), which is not bound to a particular form.  Speech is just that; expressing an idea.  You can do that in many ways, and just because one of the ways becomes obsolete, that doesn't mean that, conceptually, speech has been.  So, the form can change, but the underlying concept does not.  It doesn't matter if I yell on a street corner, publish a paper, or post on FaceBook.  All of that is speech.  But, the 2nd Amendment doesn't work like that.  It doesn't protect a concept.  It protects a thing: guns, or the ownership thereof.  But, guns are a thing, not a concept.  Guns change.  And, while society may always accept, broadly, that speech is a good thing, as guns change society gets to decide whether guns are still a good thing, the same way we get to decide whether any instrument is still useful to society.  So, we have to look at the underlying reasons why guns were protected in the first place.  Protection from the government?  Again, ha.  Haha.  In this day and age, you're fucked if Uncle Sam comes knocking, and there's no way in hell even Scalia would let you keep in your home the kind of hardware you'd need to fight off the military.  Times, they have a-changed.  So, now we're talking regular old protection from other civilians, which again, is different now than it was 200 years ago.  A very small subset of modern guns can accomplish this safely and effectively, and there's only the need for escalation when either: A ) other citizens are escalating, which laws would prevent, or  B ) when lawbreakers are escalating, which the police protects against  So, if you want to have your unnecessary guns, then start writing laws making militias a thing again or join the police, but regular old civilians aren't obviously protected here, either.  And, again, even if they ARE, guns, as a thing, cannot possibly be protected in a non-contradictory way by an Amendment like this.  After all, if the 2nd Amendment is really as good at its job as the 1st, then you should be able to own a nuke in your house.  Arms are arms.  But, obviously this is not acceptable.  There are ALL SORTS of restrictions on anything more than even a full auto.  So, what people like me are saying is NOT that you shouldn't have guns.  It's that the 2nd Amendment is garbage at its job.  Now, if it was "the right of the people of self-defense and defense against tyranny shall not be infringed", that'd be a WHOLE nother story.  But, it's not.  I'd be more than ok with defending gun rights if the 2nd Amendment was written about a concept, like the 1st.  
You had me at hartharne
I went to my local Big W with a measuring tape before I stated, I guess that they stock a different kind of tackle box because it seemed to be too small. If I'd gone somewhere like Bunnings I might have been able to find the right kind, but at that point I'd already decided to at least try the free version.
Do I have to get a contract with a carrier to use the LTE?
Not sure if should be to proud of this, got lucky both times lol. No way you predicted either of those.
512 instrument tracks ... mmm
Thanks for that I'll be sure to check it out 
Compared to what he was before, it's a vast improvement.
You're not wrong, but I sure as fuck am not getting arrested over it.  Remember that just being accused of being a pedophile will ruin you for life.
&gt;these akito movies are so terribly paced. shit really happens too quickly in these movies  Actually, I would say they are too slow rather than too fast. But not terribly paced. It depends on the viewer's tastes.  &gt;and character actions are inconsistent...  I do not think that is an accurate assessment.   &gt;this is a terrible excuse to get everyone naked  Well...is this your first time watching Code Geass?  &gt;only show the girls changing  Hey, I protest! There was an ass grab of a man!   &gt;hey we're three movies in let's introduce the fact that feMC is a massive clutz with no prior warning  I think you're missing the point. The girl was spoiled with servants all her life. She is smart, but lacks real world experience and the skills to live alone. Leila herself realizes this though, which I thought was a valid characterization.  &gt;here let's do a fortune telling that'll definitely be true even though that shit don't happen irl  The list of things in Code Geass that wouldn't happen in real life is very, very long.   &gt;isn't it nice how this ENTIRE PALACE is big enough to have knightmare battles in too?  Knightmares aren't that tall. You should visit more palaces.   &gt;wait what the fuck they just introduced all sorts of new supernatural shit into this universe in the last 5 min   Only one new element, albeit an important one.   &gt;none of this makes any sense  I would beg to differ. What do you specifically mean?  &gt;There is literally no scenario that could've occurred after the Shin/Suzaku showdown that could've reasonably resulted in what we saw and R2. None.  On the contrary, I can think of at least three different scenarios that would perfectly match what we saw in R2. 
I don't see it as a shinning role but as part of the bass section I imagine it's core to a foundation of a concert band. It was nice seeing Kumiko's Euph playing alongside Reina's trumpet for practice. 
People that are looking to get a new phone after two years.
This is actually some pretty high quality stuff right here. 
Sounds like a fun idea, might see if my friend will be with that! Trying to get him on the hype train for TPP, what better way than to show him the glorious masterpiece of MGS as a whole. :) 
I've got one of those as well.  It will chew threw a pair of alkalines pretty damn quick, but it's enough to get a couple quick solder joints done.  If I had it to do over again, I'd have gotten a [something like this](http://www.amazon.com/Bernzomatic-19132-Micro-Torch-Kit/dp/B0000CBJBQ/) instead.  It's refillable, you'll get 20 minutes off a single fill and you can also use the torch for heat-shrink.  
Was the boot installed before or after the vandalism?
Can't wait to tip some scales.
Hey, another 25 year old guy here, thank you both for sharing, I don't feel as alone any more knowing there's more people out there like me. I'm not quite sure how it helps our brains knowing were not alone, but it is comforting at least. 
Hey thanks for all the awesome recommendations guys!
[Finally](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vrQFBYgwQW8)
*Sev approaches the girl, wearing a wolf onesie.*  *She waves.* "Are you new?"
To be honest I wanted to study Northern quahogs and their aquaculture because it seemed like an attainable way to get a steady career in a field that is still interesting.  In an ideal world where I didn't have to make a living I'd like to study oceanography and ecology and larger interactions like that. 
So will WD-40
As far as I'm awear most servers seem to count air as its own outfit. It gets an allocation of slots and told to fill it.
  Username | Join date | Link karma | Comment karma :- | :-: | -: | -: cannedhamman | 14 April 2013 / 2 years  | 1 | 395  ^^This ^^information ^^does ^^not ^^guarantee ^^a ^^successful ^^swap. ^^It ^^is ^^being ^^provided ^^to ^^help ^^potential ^^trade ^^partners  ^^have ^^more ^^immediate ^^background ^^information ^^about ^^with ^^whom ^^they ^^are ^^swapping.
Wife is right
&gt; The Washington Post is compiling a database of every fatal shooting in the United States by a police officer in the line of duty in 2015.  &gt; The Post is tracking more than a dozen details about each killing — including the race of the deceased, the circumstances of the shooting, and whether the person was armed — by culling local news reports and monitoring independent databases, such as Killed by Police and Fatal Encounters. In some cases, The Post conducted additional reporting.  This is the first 3 sentences of the article that neither you, nor he, evidently read.
she is after all the person meenah fell in &lt;3 with
This is the opposite of correct.
I didn't downvote you, and I agree more posts need timestamps, but putting them all under one thread just seems like a pain for the people who are actually giving updates.  I used Reddit Stream for the live feed discussion threads, and I don't want to search out a comment thread every time I think there's something that other people might want to know about.  People should just timestamp their posts.  The significant events will get upvoted so they show up at the top using Best, and people following along chronologically using New will see them as they come up.
because you can only watch one?
There are two kinds of people in this world: those who can extrapolate from incomplete data sets.
Yup, but what I was trying to say tho is that it's a big enough concern to bother yourself with. Sure, I buy a cpu, I know the specs and all that (including the cache size), at the end of the day I know it's gonna run fine with everything packed in it. I don't need to worry about cache not gonna run/not gonna be enough with task I'm gonna do with the computer. And I never said it doesn't affect performance, all I said is that it's not big enough of a matter to be worried about. If they put a cache there with capacity of X mb, they know it's gonna run and it's gonna run fine. 
Also her oldest son looks a lot like Sokka.
I went on a date with you last night... jurassic park bro 
The spirit is in all things
Far Cry 3
If it was asthma, losing weight helps it and helps you suffocate less in your own body. I've suffered from asthma my entire life and I get it from allergies and exercise, but it's gotten a lot better since I started and I now only really use my inhaler after a hard workout and spring.
Was referring to the fact that the Winter Soldier would be involved.
No worse than the usual shit you find on Advice Animals.
Yes and by the end of the year he will be the only Spider-man in comics that is active. 
People would jizz themselves if they started officially supporting Go on Android.  Unfortunately, if they back out of the case now, it'll set a horrible precedent for everyone.
Well if it's only been a few days so I would just keep waiting. If you don't get the message from Xbox live in like a week, come back here and send me something and I'll try re inviting you. Just so you know tho, if you're doing it for the backwards compatibility there's only like 12 you can play right now
Thanks! I just didn't realize I could scroll down lol, got it.
It's about three minutes of recap and ten minutes of new footage that sets up the new conflict a little. I couldn't tell you if it's mandatory or not.
I know, it just seems strange to quote to the actor instead of the character  "No, I am your father" -James E. Jones "Life is like a box of chocolate..." -Tom Hanks "You miss 100% of the shots you don't take. -Wayne Gretzky" -Steve Carell
We don't choose to be born,  why can't we choose to die? There wouldn't be as many suicides if depression wasn't a stigma/taboo... It's really sad.   I'm also really sad for the pilot of that plain. He really played it a bit selfish, taking with him those many people that didn't want to die like he did, but then again, his mind must have been so foggy during those times... He probably didn't even think of it. He might have just chosen a painless method, the collateral victims not even being on his mind. I feel sad that he felt so bad he didn't know what he was doing.   I just want to hug people...
That's why you have the part where you write it out in letters as well...
Why don't more people walk and bike when the weather is nice?
I'm a kayle main.  I know how she works.  My opinion on the matter:  If you're going 'adc' kayle, just build full AP anyway.  Or nashor ionian runaans.  AD Kayle is nearly worthless.
"The company’s smartphone app connects someone who needs a ride with someone willing to provide it. It’s already in use in 100s of cities in 55 countries across the world. **And it’s very popular with riders, who generally pay less than they would for a cab, with faster service.**"  "Payments are handled electronically, through the app – no cash – with Uber getting a 20 percent cut. **And because driver and passenger agree on a price before hand, passengers don’t have to worry about a meter or being long-hauled.**"  Nice try but thanks for playing!
All I want is a hat (preferably a snapback) with the Jags shield on it. Not a SINGLE ONE of these seem to exist, and it's the simplest thing ever.
Pro Tip: If you really want someone to die in the blot; release all but a couple of the adult prisoners so ye ol' king has to be chosen.
I really don't get whats your deal. You legitimately asked "Why release them useless", I took the time to explain why and this is what you answer me with.  I get it, you have nothing to argue for. You like your new gods showing up in every single game and being the center of attention and basically wrecking everything in sight for the first week or two and then watching him/her get nerfed. Fine by me, but at least admit that's what you like rather than pretending it's the most effective way to balance when I clearly shown it isn't.
You need to look into domestic violence resources.  I'm going to let you in on a very scary secret - men under report domestic violence and many times people only find out when he's dead.  You need to get help and you need to reach out.  I'm going to ask you something and you need to be honest - if your little sister was being treated like that by her husband? What would you tell her to do?  Do not let gender define spousal abuse.  I'm just going to give you a list of links.... start with some research.  http://www.thehotline.org/2014/07/men-can-be-victims-of-abuse-too/  http://www.helpguide.org/articles/abuse/help-for-abused-men.htm  http://www.batteredmen.com/bathelponline.htm  This one is Michigan - just roll with it  http://menscenter.org/issues-that-affect-men/domestic-violence/  http://www.aardvarc.org/dv/malevictims.shtml  Virginia resources are http://www.aardvarc.org/dv/states/vadv.shtml
&gt;No, there's no viruses or anything.  Oh, well that's all good then - someone on the internet said the internet was ok. :)  I get you might be doing it for the right reasons - but it's best to only download from the ATO via HTTPS. You have no control over what that website might do in the background - Snowden's given us more than enough proof that there are people doing dodgy things to be able to spy on us. 
Speedfan does that. The symbols don't really correlate to anything meaningful. Think anything above 50C is a fire symbol, regardless of what component you're monitoring.
Hang on to your old motor unless they offer to take it in for trade.
I'M IN ! :)
Scalia in ten years: "I require Jell-O. *It is so ordered.*"
23 episodes and 7 seasons!? Wow. That's an investment.   I suppose it wouldn't hurt to try. As for the other shows you mentioned, I've seen them and all were lovely. 
2 Asistencias del GOAT RIP IN PEACE Chilel.
Bale. Strong, fast and a great finisher. Always scores the important goal 
So If I slash tires of normal car it won't undress my t-shirt? Or is it still dangerous? 
...per season? That's high, right? Is that high? I'm not good at salaries.
What do Deadpool comics have to do with the Wolverine movie?   I'm missing something here.
To be fair, I would totally buy those. I wanna be the most fashionable terrorist to ever terrorize the runway.
Nice legs!
Cool and maybe act 5 will have ghost piety, act 6 will have vampiety...can't we ever be rid of her
Looking at the instructions, it says something about a keygen, which seems odd, especially in this day and age. Also, Arkham Knight has Denuvo DRM, which doesn't seem like it would be vulnerable to any kind of keygen. I'd suspend judgement on this one. Wait a few hours, until other people have downloaded it, and used it, and check the comments again. Even then, the comments may be plants to trick you. I'd watch for more reputable sources. For example, I've been checking 3DM's website for a while now, though it is in Chinese, so there might have been a crack there the whole time. You'll have to use Google translate, for bbs.3dmgame.com.
It happened to me too!
Yeah I'm not denying they look at them. Just that they place more value on your UW GPA
B-b-but muh feminism
GUAHHAHHAAAAHHAHA XD IM DEAD
No the tech was an idiot
i'm asking about a case like this:  &gt;Down the sewer most likely ( 99.99999999% ) means no report documenting incident. I can't imagine anyone informally disposing of dope and then writing a report? The point of down the sewer is to avoid the documentation and work involved  if you're letting this person go with no charge, and you're not documenting it, then why destroy the person's property? 
Yeah. Something big like this they probably figured it would get shut down.
5mph less than most roads in the US, 10mph less than Alberta
$25 for a shirt?  That'll never catch on!
Something like this? Tiltdrone.com  https://youtu.be/Jgwux8WoHZM  Spoiler: I'm the programmer
Without the context the book provides, and without the conclusion the book came to, what ended up on screen was rape, whether intentional or not. If the scene didn't work out it should have been changed or cut; left as is it doesn't add to or progress the story or the characters, it's just shock value.
Did you explain the whole launcher tracking time when you submitted it?
LeMarcus Smart Troll 
Your thoughts/comments make very good sense. Indeed, I have options to consider as I move forward.  Being a strategist in structuring my work to specific markets has not been a priority.  Really...I've had no plan about how to sell my work - I know I should, but my only real interest has been this 'drive' to see my ideas become real. I love it. :)  Having said that, you're right...I need to find a market for what I've made, and what's to come.  I'd love to buy better materials, some tools...I have some designs in mind that would be just 'stunning'....I've *got* to make these. :)  Thank you so much for sharing your insights with me. Most valuable. 
Oh yeah, what app did you use?  I saw the other two pics too and they're just as sweet.
You can get it here: https://www.reddit.com/r/TexasRangers/comments/39cncf/texas_rangers_discount_tickets_are_here/
The piece was considerably engaging though I felt a real lack of connection to the fear that I expect Angus to have roaring through him in his nightmare. To overcome this I suggest adding something that the reader can really grasp onto and cause fear. Something I'd suggest is that if Angus were being stabbed he would probably have trouble breathing, also, as the knife is removed, I'd imagine flecks of blood would splatter off the blade (you didn't specify the lighting in the scene so I'm unsure what exactly is visible but I'll leave that to you). This is the only thing I can pick at that hasn't already been acknowledged in your google doc. I did, however, add a few comments and also indicated when I agreed with what others had said (a good rule of thumb in feedback is; if one person says something isn't to their liking then no biggie but if a number of people do then something needs fixing).   -JD  Edit: I indicated I agreed with a comment with a little ^ to mean, as above.
Exactly. I assumed this was how most sirens were so I don't find it very unsettling. Until the end that is.
I still have a USB floppy drive at home. Hasn't been used in years, but do I still have some dusty floppy disks.
Probs.
El problema que tenemos en Navarra es que muchos miembros del CCN ni siquiera se han leído el documento Podemos Cambiar Navarra con el que fueron elegidos, y que es el único aprobado por la Asamblea Ciudadana de Navarra.
You attempt to rob me. I have a gun and shoot you in self-defense. Did I murder you?
#you are so close!
http://i.imgur.com/xLF8UHo.gif
“She is a central figure in 20th-century feminism,” Robin Morgan, the feminist writer and former editor of Ms. magazine, said ...  http://www.nytimes.com/2010/01/07/education/07daly.html?_r=0
it was going to fail when they added countries that didn't meet the requirements. they shot them selves in the foot. 
&gt; Whether it be recognising the top 10 players/outfits on the leaderboards each week with a thread on reddit  The problem being, you are glorifying the farmers, the battlegoose HA medkit spamming farmer that is the typical player on Briggs.
&gt; When I meet with my Stake President, I don't try to convince him of anything. I never do. I explain what categories I'm struggling with, and he doesn't even want to discuss them. He just points me to articles about faith and tells me to keep the commandments. &gt; Same goes for my bishop. He almost always just says we will know when we die. He also tells me he loves me all the time. All the time. &gt; With my parents and inlaws, I don't even hardly touch the subject, but they consistently talk about how people are falling prey to "anti mormon" stuff on the internet and that Satan is deceiving even the most elect. &gt; Fairmormon tries, but they were a big part of why I lost belief. Their apologetics are often horrible and deceptive, in my opinion. And the Church itself doesn't really say the things FAIR says. &gt; The Church itself likes to reference doubt, but it doesnt' really attack it head on. The talks reference theories about moonlandings, but they don't get into the core issues. &gt; The Church Essays are sugar-coated and extremely lacking. They include positive information from sources but omit negative information. The Book of Abraham essay, for example, doesn't really get into what Joseph told everyone about the scroll and his translation. They essay doesn't address that Joseph either falsely believed he could translate Egyptian or he lied to everyone.  I'm not going to say it, but *you* know exactly why that is so.   What you are currently (appearing to be ) going through is the inner conflict as you realise the truth of the matter.   I suspect that you are wanting one of those to give you a good reason to stay, and the "pray moar" answer doesn't help.
just a thing I noticed. Nothing else really but it struck me
He could easily hit 25+ HR. Think he's worth owning, he's got legitimate power. Just look at where some of his shots land.
Kaka!  1-0 OCSC
Strangely enough everyone talks about how they do this and always have items in the same places. I always feel comfortable with items in random slots as long as my actives are in the first 4 as they're easiest to press  [dotabuff](http://www.dotabuff.com/players/163011740/matches) showing random item placements
Pelecan-us 34 voidwalker
I used typical beetle armor.
Yea, white nationalism is actually very popular in Greece right now , with Golden Dawn and all , so I was interested in it . I have some weird habits , I know .
Can confirm, have met a few people while travelling in Thailand who were there to get work done on their teeth.
YAY! I LOVE YOU BOYD!
Yeah, your first paragraph is really my point. Pulling influences is great, and should definitely be done. It just seems like with court of owls and Red Hood in particular that a whole new story with them couldn't necessarily happen without being too similar to comic arcs and not giving us anything new. With batfleck's solo, perhaps a story focusing on old Red Hood's transformation into Jared's joker with flashbacks, as well as an Under the Red Hood style Jason appearance could make for a good movie with the main theme being Batman's actions bringing about negative repurcussions? That would be a good way to bring in Tim like you said and still keep things fresh.
There really is no point in arguing. It's not in the constitution. 
That's one convenient error tho.
If Messi gets a Yellow it's his own fault. And it's to early to sub Masche off.
RemindMe! 1 Day
That counts as smurfing? Since that counts as smurfing which is a horrible crime I will delete this post.
Hah! Niiiice.
seems I was birthed too. Thanks
No; it's not economical at all. 
Sure, 40 lbs of fluff and love is scary as fuck to a cop, with their 6 different weapon systems and years of training and body armor and back up at a moments notice.
Jeez Ian you might think about changing your approach, because as all of us can see. It's not fucking working. 
I'm NC40/42 with pretty pigmented lips, and Mac Creme in Your Coffee is the HG MLBB for me that I can wear every day.  It took a long time to find something that had the perfect pink to brown ratio - I never need a liner with it to help it blend (but not so sheer that it's pretty much just showing my lip color underneath).  And it's incredibly moisturizing, I've even used it sometimes when my lips feel like they need balm. Milani naturally chic is also a good match, but it's a bit drier.  
Which is why we fight you 100/50 :)
my mom didn't abort me.
I wouldn't be surprised in the least if it was revealed that the government knew more about extraterrestrial life than it lets on. I'm not talking about the "lizard people" stuff, but it's entirely possible that we have been contacted by alien species and the government is afraid to tell us because it would cause widespread panic.
What difficulty? 
Thats not how this works :/
It's like Beirut/Beer pong, it's a regional thing. I live in the Rockies and have always heard disc golf. 
He's obviously making a toast sandwich you cultureless fuck.
Just because there's a stereotype you think you shouldn't study it?
Nothing wrong with that.
That's a pretty nice number for Rosalina. Hope TRU gets around that much for Lucario. Hopefully he, Little Mac, and Villager will be restocked soon so I can finally be done... Until Dark Pit and Palutena.
Yeah you got sooo shredded bro. You look fantastic. 10/10 great cut. 
But can it run Arkham Knight at 30 FPS?
**User Summary for [/u/unicorndanceparty](https://www.reddit.com/user/unicorndanceparty/):**  Flair: GCX Beginner  Karma Level: High  Account Age: 3 year(s), 10 month(s), and 27 day(s)  [Link to GCXRep Profile ^**1**](http://www.reddit.com/r/GCXRep/comments/336oaa/uunicorndanceparty_gcx_rep_profile/?ref=search_posts)  Age of Oldest GCXRep Profile: 2 month(s) and 11 day(s)  ----  [Rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/giftcardexchange/wiki/rules) | [Wiki](https://www.reddit.com/r/giftcardexchange/wiki/index) | [Safe Trading Guide](https://redd.it/2gig0n) | [Universal Scammer List](https://www.reddit.com/r/UniversalScammerList/wiki/banlist) | [Message the Bot Creator](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=BKLCL) | [Message the Mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fgiftcardexchange) | [Bot Usage](http://redd.it/37sdxu)  ----  **Notes:**  1: GCXRep is set to restricted. You must be added as an approved submitter to post, but not to comment.  2: We strongly suggest you trade on a PC rather than on mobile; you can more easily access various information.   3: I can now reply to comments! OP can type "!check" along with the /u/usernames of any users OP wants to check.  ----  **Do not solely rely on this comment. Please also do your own research to trade as safely as possible.**  ^^This ^^user ^^summary ^^was ^^generated ^^by ^^a ^^bot ^^created ^^by ^^[/u/BKLCL](https://www.reddit.com/user/BKLCL/). ^^If ^^you'd ^^like ^^to ^^help ^^pay ^^for ^^hosting, ^^please ^^message ^^the ^^bot ^^creator.  ^^BTC ^^Address: ^^19sAGmQk9K62xUCdAw6qPh36FcmdjFsHAs
Brain death is probably a good description, heh. Apparently it's something you can get over once you lose the weight, at least according to the helpful user who went into detail about it.  I personally just can't understand getting there in the first place. Now I'm a very understanding person when it comes to eating disorders. My ma has a problem with emotional eating, while I get freaked out when I gain weight. I was borderline if not full blown anorexic for a long time. I'm better now, maybe on the cusp of underweight, but I have a better relationship with food. It was seriously like having to retrain my brain.  If you felt to far gone to get better, I'd understand that. 
Have you considered the possibility that the guy was being nice? sometimes, when I just need a draw in seasons for promotion/title, I'll score own goals just like this with LT + RT to give the other guy a point!
My mother was a big fan of Escaflowne, so a couple years ago I watched the whole show. It is so unique and does so much things right, a pleasure to watch really
it was the wind BABE
'At this point all you can do is minimize.' Minimization complete. Now bats.
i've been told american sweets are crap compared to ..... everywhere else. too much sugar.  this is a shock.
Um....you do realize that GG currently has this very topic posted 7 hours before this post and it's currently #1 with 1000 up votes right?  I don't really pay much attention to this topic any more but you could have spent 30 seconds to just look at the page before making this post.
"What's the meaning of life! Just give me a sign!" "Get the new J's"
Dazwa is the legend behind [this.](http://gfycat.com/BadForthrightFerret)
I always run into problems with the "wait for 3 waves while Dinklebot opens the door" part; is there an easier way to do that? Or is it just sit behind the things by the door and pop cheap shots at the people on the other side before ducking back down to lick your wounds?
Or did he?
It's certainly a risk since their commitment to the "offer" is a wink and a nod.
We did. His name is Trea.  EDIT: I see you edited that second sentence in there. Let it be known.
I gotta ask, do you believe in anything that is outside of your own experience?
I don't know too much about the PS4. I do know that it uses an APU, which is a combined CPU and GPU. Similar APUs are available for PCs, but use DDR3, and the graphics component is limited by the lower bandwidth of the DDR3.  Since the PS4 is a custom system that does not conform to all of the same programming and architecture standards as a regular x86 style PC, they may be using custom low-level or operating system functions that allow the CPU to work OK with GDDR5.  It's one of the things that allow consoles to wring more performance out of the same hardware vs PCs. They are a bit more specialized. Regular PCs have to meet specific standards that allow them to perform tons of different tasks, instead of being specialized in mostly games and media playback. PCs are a 'jack of all trades' kind of thing.
Vaarsuvius potentially has the wherewithal to accomplish a feat. He did call Celia's huge legal defense speech to be brief. 
what
Well, you're half right. In the desktop's some have a dual core i7 with hyper thread
Haha, good response! By the you should check out the subreddit /r/Liberland   We could use active people...
https://www.reddit.com/r/Minecraft/comments/3boy3o/my_take_on_a_better_minecon_2015_cape/ My design
What would be the purpose of that? To prevent a few ticket refunds from the minority of people who bought tickets to see Aldo?
I don't understand why anyone would get text in a language that is not their own. Unless you have some strong connection to that language/culture, I think the whole thing is rediculous. At the very least, if you can't read/write it, don't put it on your skin.   Also, given current events, there will probably be some stigma of having Arabic looking text tattooed on your body. While this really shouldn't matter, it could potentially cause some you some issues.
all these band wagons -_-
The only guess I would make is scan the furthest rooms at the top left, then after scan the hallways.
[Vitbalansen](http://i.imgur.com/aNbt4yE.jpg) med.
Breasts come in different shapes and different tissue density and distribution just like they come in different sizes. There are plenty of Western women who have worn bras since they grew breasts whose breasts look like those of the African women in the photos. The journalist in the photos just happens to have not only a different breast shape from the African women, but a breast shape, breast size, and breast tissue density that's seen as especially attractive in modern Western society. 
Imagine if they'd delayed it another year to make it solely a Wii game and take advantage of that hardware boost.
kk send it to to my paypal, vvlajnic@gmail.com
[we're 2 up and another forced sub for Paraguay?!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M67E9mpwBpM)
Travel away! 
thanks 
tru dat
I don't even get what "answers" people wanted. I had no big unsolved question I needed answering. I mean how do you explain Jacobs cabin beyond "magic" anyway. 
If your SMV is sufficiently high, your woman will stay with you no matter what you do.  But you have to be the highest SMV that she thinks she can get. Open marriages are hard, and not for everyone.  Half-open marriages are even harder.   And quit reasoning with women.  Imply what they want to hear; let them hamster to the "facts."  They will lie to themselves far faster than you can.  Some will NOT tolerate non-exclusiveness.  
He is still an amateur.
Probably the northeast United States mainly because of how cramped it is, how hard it is to get around, and those damn bridges and tolls. But you can probably get some good money compared to your cost by getting into a regular gig running steel thru the southeast and Midwest. 
It doesn't really matter what we think. It matters what she thinks. And she doesn't like the idea that you only went to her after the first girl didn't work out. This girl doesn't want to date you. Move along. 
My eye twitched. 
Abby Wambach=post-divorce Tiger Woods
POSEY!!!!!!!
I guess I remembered why I stopped trying to help people on reddit. I offer a legitimate workaround to the issue, and get downvoted for it.
Yes, as soon as the price goes down by half in about a year
How about "Fashionably Late"? Get a little more marketing value out of it. Plus I'm sure you dress well. Or something.
It kind of looks like planaria, but has only two parts on the end instead of three so it might not be. I've got some in my tank also, and so far they have not been a huge issue. They do not directly prey on coral though they can get to such large populations that they cause indirect issues. If you want them gone try a six-lined wrasse or after removing as many as you can I've heard flatworm-exit will do the trick.
[What it would look like as a candied red. ](http://i.imgur.com/zcahiFR.jpg)
A squirrel pissed on my friend's shoulder while we were looking up at it in a tree 
I have Restless Left Syndrom.
Socialists are all about putting people in camps, especially is some sort of education or reeducation/indoctrination is involved 
Awww so precious! Best of luck with those yellow jackets. 
No, I don't.
Duck typing in cpp? IS NOTHING SACRED?
Hello /u/hulksmash911911,  Thank you for your submission. Unfortunately your account does not have enough karma to post things to /r/videos at this time.   /r/videos requires users have, at a minimum, 10 link **and** 10 comment karma.  We suggest that you comment in some popular threads and submit links to other subreddits to build up your karma and then come back.  We do this to prevent spammers from abusing /r/videos. We are sorry for any inconvenience caused, and look forward to your submissions in the future. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/videos) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I have not played bloodborn  Eso is awesome I love it, even better than I expected If you get eso add me Rizzik , playing ebonhardt pact
if those don't work (didn't for me) the download link for each song can be seen on hover: https://soundcloud.com/quinfolk/sets/sc1 https://soundcloud.com/quinfolk/sets/sc2 Some good video here: https://www.youtube.com/user/RadioChildRecords/videos
That's true. Now that I think about, we had a couple unmarked 981 Corbin originals rolling around when I worked for Pasadena Unified. They were using those awful New Standard ones, but apparently had some leftovers from when they cared about quality.
She can have kids. she just can't have a pregnancy.  She already gave you a family - she married you. the two of you are a family. Even if it's just the two of you, you are a family, and that is valid.  And if the two of you want to add children to your family at some point, there are *many* different ways available today that can help the two of you do it, even if the classic way isn't an option for her.   This is one closed door, but it's a long hallway, and a lot of other doors remain open - she just needs to be able to look further and see them. She may need to grieve this loss first, but there are still so many options for you.  
No, they determined intent of the text. It isn't an unusual thing to do and while I don't care to do the research I can guarantee that last time they did it and it benefitted conservative issues nobody complained.   Nobody even knew that miswording was there until the lawsuit. Everyone on both sides thought the exchanges and subsidies were following the letter of the law. Nobody noticed.   Because we all knew what the intent was. Otherwise the subsidies would have been stopped before they happened and not when someone analyzed the text and found a mistake. 
I live on planet Earth.
The r/911truth sub is now specifically for the 9/11 truth movement.  You can make r/911truthdebate if you like.  Did you see the sub before that rule was made?  Disinformation trolls do not debate - they disrupt, distract, lie, insult, and brigade. It was a constant battle not a debate.
Exactly!
So compatibility failures are ok when they're political (and we like the politics)?
OK, I'm going to go online pretty soon.
these are awesome, i like what you're doing with these
...
Yet another reason why I refuse to do this shit. 
Pacific Daylight Time Zone, anytime.
She was a child when you made that promise. Now she is a destructive, self centered adult. You need to take action before you irrevocably harm your relationship with your other daughter. Pay a portion of her rent in a new place or offer to furnish it but it is time for her to go, as she has no appreciation for the home you are providing.
Bomb would be an understatement. 
I don't know guys. I played trials with her last weekend and... It was obvious she was not a boy from the start. Like I heard her start to speak and I was like "oh word I hope this girl wrecks shit" in my head. Then we found out she has FoAF and was like hell yea that's fucking awesome! Anyway point I'm trying to make is that females, and young boys (squeakers) sound nothing alike. Like seriously if you can't tell the difference between a woman's voice, and a squeaker's voice, then that is just sad, and she does not sound like a squeaker, she sounds like a woman. There is a notable difference in pitch, and tone.  Edit: really? What am I getting down voted for? My post is not offensive and it adds to the conversation
send it to BCR Greg repair. It'll be good as new once he's done with it.
They didn't say they would make it equal, *but they should have been straightforward about that.* I'm sure a community manager or two will suggest we can't read when, you know, it would be nice to be clear.  Also, please stop the ninja patching.
it's so pretty haha. i think you need more ness
Every single one of us started and felt in a way like you do. What you must do is run and keep running and just go out there and do it and keep running and play around and run different distances each day and have fun with it. (I run for fun but also for health and to have this healthy lifestyle to leech off of an Maintain till I reach my older years)  How you eat WILL alter your running. Eat whole foods (real foods) &amp; drink h2O (tons)   Go to a running or shoe store and I recommend either brooks or saucony brand shoes (just what works for me)
Where did you manage to find them? I have only found 1 so far.
He did good.
Gwinnett Wit It!
Tat tatoo
ALL HAIL BATHMAT
Almost everything you want to do you can accomplish with the tools shipped with the OS.   You can have a Zabbix data collector agent take data you output to a file and store/trend/etc in the Zabbix DB.  You will just need to be careful with how you build it.  If you set a watchPath to /Volumes you can create code with logic to capture external disks being mounted, however, it will also capture network shares, disk images (like a DMG) and so forth.   Alternatively you can disable USB drives from a configuration profile using the OS X standard MDM spec.  You can side load profiles with out using MDM as well, although it is more work.  Google probably won't help you too much unless you know the exact question to ask.  Had you Google searched expiring passwords with pwpolicy you might have got some decent hints.  I assume these accounts are local and not LDAP?  This is what I do for a living so I am happy to hep out the /r/sysadmin community on such things since it seems there is mostly Microsoft, Cisco, and VMware stuff posted here.  Which totally makes sense, since all those products are very mainstream in enterprises.  If you have any more questions ask away.
It simply needs a few final points:  1. All the above are not the equivalent of a law degree nor police training. Specifics may vary. 2. Comply with *all* instructions given by police, though if appropriate you may ask if it is a request or an order. Do not argue with them, even if you think they are wrong. Let them screw up, it gets you off later! 3. If you have any problems with how the police interacted with you, inform your lawyer about it and they will deal with it properly.
I still to finalize the official version 50 waiting on a monitor atm. 
This reads like a word problem from math class.
Every time I see videos like this, I think about the phenomenal shape these guys are in. MacAskill must have tree trunks for legs.
Um, that's kind of an ignorant statement.   Both sides do the same thing, and at the end of the day, they still are protecting the country...
Trapper I think is in a decent spot if you go crit with a fire trap shadow.You can fix the spellcaster issue by not getting any auras besides clarity and grace then taking phase acrobatics. Skill tree would be trap nodes plus witch aoe + crit nodes and a few mana nodes.   I'm going SRS myself but I haven't decided how to deal with my defenses besides super tank zombies. Probably just stack life and see if I can get by with a hybrid es+life build with MoM. 
OMG VERLANDER STAHHHP
Very flavorful. I'd recommend the Bambino or the Derringer for the Kbox. It was getting hot when I chain vaped it, so since the Kbox has a fixed 510, I unscrewed the 510 on the RDA a little tiny bit to make a slight gap between the box and rda to reduce any heat conduction. Works like a charm doing that. Banging flavourful clouds from a compact VW device. 
And thats exactly what i think. While I myself may not think gay marriage is a good thing, i cannot support the government trying to determine what marriage is and what it isn't. As a libertarian i think that the market should determine that. I wouldn't be surprised if a bunch of republicans now run on "deregulating marriage"
/r/brogress dude
You didn't answer the question and threw in a little backhanded comment. Nice. 
Sorry everyone I was baked. Seemed like a good idea at the time... 
This is the truth.  DayZ video content is probably some of the most positive stuff, coming from positive people, that you will see on this sub. Yet they get downvoted to hell.
YEAHSSSS!
No need to be agressive, I was actually curious if mods really didn't delete content because there isn't enough of it or if it was only my impression. I still feel that moderation should ideally be less lenient, but I understand the sub wouldn't be able to handle instant content deletions.
I get that there is a disparity. But that does not change my opinion that the cast in Samoa were dull and pointless.
you are the worst type of person don't do this
I'm not sure if this is evidence, but in Land Before Swine, where Mcgucket is talking to Grunkle Stan and the gang, Grunkle Stan says "Ugh, this guy." Does that mean Stan doesn't like Mcgucket?
annual average value 
There is no mention of Shadowcat, either. How do you feel about that?
Average game time is about 40 minutes, but I still feel like that's too long.  Dota is definitely the most grindy of the multiplayer games I've played, especially coming from starcraft where a long game means some epicness from both sides ... or swarm hosts =,(.  Anyways you're not alone and I would personally be in favor of small changes to make games shorter.  That's probably the direction moba is going anyway, look at hots, average length of 20 mins or less.
Do you like magggggaaaazzzziiiiinnnneeees?
Is there a Kurt Russell subreddit?
It's a cast fake of the following coin:  Alexander I Balas AR Drachm. Antioch mint, 150-146 BC. Diademed head right / BASILEWS ALEXANDROU QEOPATOROS EYERGETOU, Apollo left on omphalos, cornucopiae left  Edit: [here](http://www.vcoins.com/en/stores/perseus_ancient_coins/124/product/alexander_i_balas_king_of_syria/217860/Default.aspx) is an authentic example
alright but i think he was talking about the downvotes you're bitching about
westchester brodie !!!!!
&gt; All efforts to reach the Plaintiff have been futile on all subjects relative to this litigation... You can probably guess whose former lawyer mentioned that in a motion to withdraw.
He's crazy. No denying that. But he's one of the most good hearted dudes you'll ever meet. And his personality is absolutely magnetic. Just listen to Serra talk about how Renzo helped him out, Renzo would do that for anybody. 
Chicago needed a center to replace Brad Richards, and Arty is a very affordable alternative who will service them well.  Dano is a great young talent.  He's only 20 years old, and in the 30-some games that he played this past season he put up numbers very comparable to what Saad did in his first half season when he was the same age.  There's nothing to say that after another year or two that Dano couldn't end up being as good as Saad, or even better.  Especially playing on a team like the Blackhawks.  But the big thing is that he's a heck of a lot cheaper for the next few years.  I wouldn't call Tropp and Morin junk.  They're not superstars, but they were definitely extra pieces for us clogging up the board.  I'd call both "serviceable" NHLers, probably on the 4th line.  But they're both young and cheap, which is what Chicago needs right now with all of their cap trouble.  If you'll recall, Morin actually came to us from Chicago, so they are definitely familiar with them.  All in all I think that it was a pretty fair trade.  We traded 4 players to clear a logjam that will hopefully allow us to re-sign Letestu, and we got back a very very young and probably first line winger in the deal who has already won two cups.  That's some very useful experience.  Chicago knew that they couldn't pay Saad what he was worth and avoided losing him on an offer sheet, while getting a serviceable center to replace the very expensive Brad Richards.  Chicago filled some holes and she did it without breaking the bank.
Sweet Christmas!
**Attention!** Please keep in mind that the OP of this thread has chosen to mark this post with the **[Serious] replies only** tag, therefore [any replies that are jokes, puns, off-topic, or are otherwise non-contributory will be removed](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_--.5Bserious.5D_tags--).  If you don't fall within the scope the question is directed to, please do not reply to the question as your comment will be removed. If the question is "Bakers of reddit..." and you're not a baker, your comment will be removed. All top-level replies need to be from someone who is in the group the question was asked to.  If you see others posting comments that violate this tag, please report them to the mods!   Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Hahaha what dealer in ontario? I thought this was one of our plates for a second! 
I fail to see how those two things are the same at all. For example, I could tell you to gild this comment over and over again until you do, but that wouldn't constitute forcing you, let alone threatening you. 
Just imagine Apple's servers when X million people connect to the stream on the clock.
*Walking over to the new camper, he smiled.* "Hey there. New?" *His verdant eyes shone happily as he spoke with his naturally grey hair gently wafting in the breeze.*
Really great. Thanks for sharing!
fantastic
After the third request to step off the train, its time to kick up the force. This is what pepper spray and tazers are for. 
ErgoCogito Add me to a party or join mine
Just as a prank tho 
why is it an .exe
Look into Monks, they specialize in unarmed combat. You might be able to temporarily give them a power or modify it to make sense for that character.
No worries. Today belongs to you guys.   #BOOM
he's pretty balanced now, but he might not be played on xbox because of how fast you need to aim his dashes and the 180's you need to pull of. if you even miss your dash a bit and hit the wrong person it'll go on cooldown and that can mean your death.
The Egyptologist who discovered it has a blog, this is her article talking about it.  http://biblicalanthropology.blogspot.com/2010/11/galit-dayan-jews-lived-in-dynastic.html
For those interested:  [French Army Combat Ration: Part 1](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x-e52ILTWVw)  [And part II](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rUDai_n7h2k)
Looks pretty good.  More interesting than Southpaw at least.
Yes they are
it's all a bit paradox, because we recognize them by not recognizing them
Oh. That's actually pretty impressive. Did you learn the game on X box or something?  Edit: wait, isn't the estus flask mandatory to progress the plot?
I like your sentiment but how quality of a sport do we have when creativity is stunted by a simple yet dominant design?  We need the boring smash and grab style of Tombstone because he is the orc to everybody else's elf.  He is just the villain we need and the use of netting should be in the conversation.
I agree wholeheartedly on support sven for the armor. 20 armor from warcry makes any hero with no armor extremely tanky. Combine that with medallion and auras like vlads and you've got a supercharged team that takes no physical damage.   My friends and I experimented lone druid and sven to try to buff the bear to the maximum armor we could and have it siege towers. I think we got to like 50 or 60 armor and it took no damage at all other than a few magical nukes
It's been running fairly passive for me today, despite all the lag time this weekend. It tends to need some babysitting, but I'm usually at the computer when I have it running.
*Flash walks up to the fire, and sits with a s'more.*
Koi's  Zero's Banned 1s
Just pink the spears
'Merica 
Manwich sloppy joes.
Precisely! I mean, what if this same technique could be used for malaria-carrying Mosquitos in Africa? Something like that could be a turning point for that entire continent. 
Don't know if this is true but don't you flip them over so they don't swallow their tongue? 
I'm close to having Luke to 6* he's beyond a beast. I use him daredevil and iron fist for the bonus'
That's not the brand name.  That's a tag to tell you what side of the bed that edge of the sheet goes on.  My guess is they are king sized sheets.  A king sized mattress has little difference in dimension between length and width (76" × 79.5").  So, it can be hard to tell at a glance if you are putting a fitted sheet on sideways.
You could also try a blue black tezz deck. It is basically blue black control that uses [[tezzeret, agent of bolas]] to win.
Nobody gives a shit, until they want to hate on you.
Basic health insurance covers it so always call an ambulance to get it noted at their physician. Interval, duration and intensity are measures of underlying factors and how they might progress.  Might depend on country a bit though
Because when it has happened with every new person like clockwork, you start to just ignore those people's opinions.
No problem. Glad some good came from my stupidity.
where do you see it? which freeway.  ive been going down 880/101/680 for a decade+ and have seen this maybne 3-4 times.
I'm loving it a whole lot, especially on expert mode. My only qualm is that respawning after being killed by a boss takes a dickyear and a half.
I feel the same way. I'd rather see the Browns win a super bowl than watch the Ravens win another.
Nothing is overridden. You can do all the same religious stuff you could do before.   You just have to bear to exist in a country where some people are legally married to people of the same gender.
Confirmed  https://youtu.be/huaH-WPpiiM?t=3765
Can you post a picture of the mixer's power input port?
Sorry! I have a one sheet for each day of the week.   Sunday Forecast, Monday Forecast, etc.   I have a variable named Day that will always be the same as the sheet that needs to be unhidden.   Basically I need a way to say Sheets("'VARIABLE' forecast")  Does that make sense?
"You need some water, bambie? Here, drink it from my hand like an baby deer."
Hah, 4k+ hours here, still a scrub learning and discovering stuff everytime.
Oh i was on lo loesterin fe and I was crying hysterically 4 days into the pack, so I stopped immediately. Good news is that I was approved for sterlization so this whole birthcontrol will be a thing of the past soon!
He looks like an older version of Jerome from Vine..
I  guess I could see the emo connection, but it still sounds pretty metal.
As it turns out the previous poster was straight up lying. The accused in this case had no previous convictions, and was in fact a wealthy, and by all accounts upstanding member of society at the time of the allegations.
http://techdissected.com/ask-ted/ask-ted-how-many-ppi-can-the-human-eye-see/ and many others.  Some claim it to be a myth, but their arguments center around either abnormally superb vision (extreme edge cases) or abnormal focal distance (decreasing from normal/average use methodology).  At a reasonable phone use range, with 20/20 accepted as a "very good" vision metric, human eye resolution is in the low 300s PPI range.  We surpassed that in most phones ages ago.  
Cam 4 - 4:55-:58  Simply put, Audrey is using psychobabble to basically say to Jeff and Austin that if she's HoH next week, she'll nominate based on personal feelings.
I tightened the wheel so I don't think its the brake pad.
Can we go back to the Islanders who signed the DiPietro contract and not these scary good Isles?
"at the end of the day"   "at the end of the day"   Aaaayyyy
Your ass is so delicious....
Love the immediate shift from excited to upset your mind experienced when reading the post.
Bard and Evelynn  Ninja Edit: And Caitlyn
Dank stonalds, bubbler king, kentucky fired cannabis...
Best bet is to probably wait for the update to HideMe8 for 8.4 support, otherwise you could try Springtomize 3
&gt; Content providers can sell the ebook rights to Amazon for any amount of money they choose.   But how much luck will they have selling for the amount they choose to anyone *besides* Amazon?
Yep. Got a Camry with 95000 on it for $5k. Put 50000 on it before I had to replace something other than routine stuff like brake pads. Still running great.
Are you talking about the one you have to download from the shop? I never really learned what it did. Could you explain?
Along the lines of "bringing home the Bacon"?
rpetrich will you update the tweak to the latest iOS ? Sadly I never used that tweak before but im closing apps all the time and I just try everything to get more battery life because my iPhone 5 battery drains to 0% in less than 4/5 hours :/
I'm glad someone else picked up on that.  Good to see that "sex positivity" stuff is really taking off.
I doubt I'll be getting smashed, but others can follow their hearts :)
Poole got traded for Stabling. 
This is so true. No worry.
420 BRUH
Damn that's crazy
&gt; but now that the policy is gone (Thanks, Ronnie!)   exactly what revenue sharing do you think reagan got rid of?  As far as I can tell, federal transfers to states have only increased since 1980.
I don't see the sober time as thrown away. Every day is a success we can be proud of. 
Gypsies are different.  Source: *The Riches* staring Eddie Izard
The review will probably find the independence of the Baltic States unconstitutional due to the lack of transitional period and referendum. Only two Russian MP's causing the whole atrocious thing. The way I read it, the Russian Prosecutor General's Office is only doing it because the request for review was made and they legally have to follow through. Sadly, the results will likely provide justification for the imperialists in the capital to start playing hard-ball with our smaller states on the border. 
Nope. Just bought a pair of yellow shorts once
Such a sick shot, I almost had one of those today, lol it wouldve been epic.
I would be willing to trade 1 Dragonite code for 1 Charizard code if you are willing. Got the 1 dragonite code from my local gamestop but prefer charizard.
But why a .gifv? Why not a YouTube link?
[Are you sure...](http://www.writersdigest.com/wp-content/uploads/pat.jpg)
This was literally my reaction... I was looking at the Deth machine rifle and trying to figure out what that had to do with Volt lol
Thanks for such a quick response dude.   What would you change if I wanted to bring the price point down below $700?
Hi, /u/Uneje! It looks like you haven't filled out our [helpful form](http://www.reddit.com/r/SuggestALaptop/wiki/form), which guides you through most of the things that we need to know to give you useful advice. So, please do!  You can edit your original post to add the form, or post it in the comments; please don't create a new post with the form (or, if you do, please delete this post to reduce clutter). Your post has not been removed, this is just a reminder about the form!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/SuggestALaptop) if you have any questions or concerns.*
The last console I owned was a nintendo 64.
Never got that message but found it out the hard way by getting an HDMI connector for my iPad then plugging it in and it working really shittily or not at all depending on the TV.  Have to wait a few more weeks (hopefully not much longer) for Apple exclusivity to run out.
And not just that, the way the station went about everything was perfect.
That is fair, I thought of that as I was typing the post
Yeah, I know the limitations, having everything server sided sucks, I felt that was a well known limitation so I wouldn't have to express it. Anyway, I understand what you're saying, and I know VAC will ban it my only worry is if it becomes a war. For all VAC has done for CS:GO, there are still people using cheats, and everytime the old one is worked against, they cheaters come up with something new. It's an endless cycle, unless something revolutionary is done I don't see it stopping.  Edit: How will source 2 prevent this? Can you explain more on that.
I'm surprised no one's mentioned "You can't do that on stage anymore" Vol. 3 disc 1. Very fun.
And this only happens on export? What if you export to a format other than H.264?
Yea man, it can't just be me. Thanks for confirming!
It's a really shitty name based off of the motor oil brand Quaker State and the fact that the first one opened in an old service station/garage (and originally emphasized steak).  Offputting as hell to me, and there aren't even any where I live.
Hey Stephanie! &lt;triple checks that I spelled your name right&gt; Christine here! :)
Hey this isnt loading for me?
For the spiders you have an [arrowhead orbweaver](http://bugguide.net/node/view/2035) (great find), and a [spined orbweaver](http://bugguide.net/node/view/1996) (another great find).
vulcun is sponsoring streamers who aren't the ones being used for the betting companies benefits
ah alright that makes sense
No offense man, but trading your very reliable and solid starting goalie for cap space is incredibly stupid.   Thank Christ you're not an NHL GM.
You're using the comment formatting, you need to find [flare around this area under your post](http://i.imgur.com/1ze7svG.png) to set a spoiler tag.
Don't the feeling of not being at war and necessity contradict each other? Also, what about when they were still alive?
### **[Ninja III\: The Domination (1984)](http://www.imdb.com/Title?Ninja+III%3A+The+Domination+%281984%29)**  Action, Horror [[USA:R](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Motion_Picture_Association_of_America_film_rating_system#Ratings), 1 h 32 min]   Shô Kosugi, Lucinda Dickey, Jordan Bennett, David Chung   Director: Sam Firstenberg  **IMDb rating:** [](#movieguide_stars)**&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9733;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;&amp;#9734;** **4.8**/10 (2,206 votes)  &gt; The body of a sexy aerobics instructor is invaded by the evil spirit of a dying ninja. At first, changes in her behavior is limited to having strange interactions with an arcade game, doing sexy things with V8 juice, and being attracted to an unusually hairy police officer. But soon enough, she's systematically killing, ninja-style, the officers responsible for the ninja's death, and can only be stopped by another ninja\! (*IMDb*)  More info at [IMDb](http://www.imdb.com/Title?Ninja+III%3A+The+Domination+%281984%29), [Wikipedia](https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?curid=5137345), [Freebase](http://www.freebase.com/en/ninja_iii_the_domination).   *I am a bot.* [Send me feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMovieGuide&amp;subject=Re%3A%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F3bp0qp "Confidence: 1.00"). [Data sources and other information](/r/MovieGuide/w/about).
;) It's probably my best part 
Why is the white lady part special? It doesn't seem to lead to a special area like secret #5 or #4, nor does it offer special mechanics like the organ one, just seems like a regular rare quest? Did I miss something?
He fouls off balls that he should be hitting. That was what he used to be good at. What's his worth at this point?
I just have this working.  However, (using EventGhost) I see everything working, but after a successful command I get an error from Alexa saying she cannot reach the desired device.  So it works, executes but is not sending a result back.  Is that normal ?
Not buying related, but what is that theme call? Look awesome. GLWS!
I may or may not get hate for this, but I can't stand the assholes on MLB Tonight. They ass kiss the same players over and over again and ask the most cliche questions.
At least Hendricks is pitching well.
Well spoken tribal people at that.
What do you even have to offer? All your good wingers are old and you're not trading any young D.
She just blinks. "Who..led to...Marnie, what *is* all this?"
How do you know she is 13? Are you stalking her you piece-of-shit-of-a-dog-who-ate-his-own-vomit ?
its manual and it is definitely easier with two people.  I am definitely thinking of getting the Kitchenaid one but we dont make too much pasta =(
Video download button ~~can be~~ has been added, but I'm not sure about audio. It *could* be done, but it would require more knowledge of the webm and ogg containers than I have. I might look into it more though.
Do you know how old Kurdistan is?
Interesting lineup today, but we need it.   Can someone be so kind to tell me what our winning percentage for June will be if we win tonight's game?
Don't ever consider low calorie vegetables as your main calorie sources. They will never fill you up. Treat them as condiments or a side dish. Instead get the bulk of your calories from foods like rice, potatoes, whole wheat, sweet potatoes, sugary fruits like bananas and dates and mangoes, pasta, quinoa, oatmeal, cereal, grits, corn, and beans. 
No. I said *you* were. You were the one spouting the 'Skyrim is for the Nords' Aryan Brotherhood bullshit.  Fun fact: My halberd's named Judgement. Don't have anything named Prejudice though...  Oh wait. That can be you.
You say you haven't read a Fox article in years, but the source you provided above was from Fox. Either you're lying, or you're saying that you don't read articles that you use as citation and just become blindly enraged by the headline and form an opinion off of one sentence that you base a ridiculously crazy argument off of and use the same thing repetitively to attack people, because you refuse to look further into the issue at hand and lack the knowledge to create your own thoughts because you have to be told what to do. As for forcing all citizens to bake gay cakes, I've heard nothing about this from any reliable sources. It reminds me of the time when fox said that Obama was going to start executing white people. Or the time when he was supposed to reveal himself as the anti-Christ. Or when everyone in America was going to get Ebola because a few people got sick while they were in Africa. Fox has never been reliable, reasonable, sane, fair, or balanced. The only smart thing they've ever done was to get rid of Glenn Beck.
I had the idea for a comedic video based on cardistry (rather than a comedic cardistry video, subtle difference) maybe two years ago. I had a bunch of ideas, this was one of them. I always had Animus Vox in mind for the song, at least for that segment just because it embodies the tension I wanted to break with the 'weee'. Recently though, I made the decision to make it a standalone video, to make the effect more surprising. Location was handy, so I went for it. I gave myself some time to get somewhat of a mental plan on where to put what. Then I did the editing and color grading over a couple hours basically in one go. 43 seconds is short, but the Glitch Mob certainly made the process more tricky. The most difficult maybe is to decide where each sequence of clip goes. Where you can and where you want to put it doesn't always coincide. Color grading was fairly straightforward, I knew I wanted something dark yet crisp. Matching the shot was more difficult (as usual really).   As for shooting alone, basically the trick is to have patience. Nothing is taken for granted, in my case focus and framing were very difficult since I couldn't see myself until I had made the shot. It's really important to watch the footage carefully, and to have plenty of takes. I was too lazy there and had to shoot the last cut again, which wasn't great. When filming, it can help to move your arms around a bit to have slightly different angles from the camera: move your arms up a bit, maybe it will be more in frame, or the opposite, etc. Something that may or may not be obvious is just to keep the camera rolling while doing the cut over and over. It's a bit more of a paint to deal with in post, but will save time on the shoot. Also having a decent tripod is a good idea, though if you're by yourself then you probably won't pan than much.   This is slightly unrelated, but also I find it really helpful to label your footage when looking over it, like 'Crabshack ++' etc. It eliminates redundancies, since most cameras will output videos with basically the same name.   Got a bit carried away there, hope you get something out of it!
Modesty is very important. Except in the temple. How else could leadership check out the goods during the polygamy days to figure out which sisters to marry?
nopeD: try ONE more time, srry:/
While I don't share your enthusiasm for paulinho,I do think that everyone sells him way shorter than he deserves.   He should have been starting over mason 50 percent of the time. He is a much better footballer. 
It's correct terminology is the "cut kick".
wow! gotta love the world we live in today where drag queens (picked from out of the club *and then by Rupaul*) have a really well-produced album!
This is equal parts CYA and social skills.  The CYA part is keep log of what you've done. If you leave the user with instructions, send them an email so you have record of it.  The social part is that some people don't operate on logic, they operate on how they perceive the other person's emotions / frame. If you react weakly or apologetic, they think you are wrong and weak. If you react with confidence and strength, they think you are confidence / strength. This is because they might lack logical understanding, but can read people well enough to get by regardless.  In this case, you need to stand by what you've done (remember the CYA part), and not give them any room when they try to verbally bully you around. Don't get reactionary, calmly state the same thing over and over, show them the CYA logs and STAND BY YOUR POSITION.   If you can't do anything more, then calmly explain this to them "There is nothing more than can be done about this without a repeatable error". and don't react to their bullying.  From their perspective... If they bully people, then 9/10 the other person will crack and they'll be shown to be right. When the other 1/10 happens and the person stands back up to them, they realize "oh maybe this is a real issue" and will listen to you.  You HAVE HAVE HAVE to learn how to deal with these people in business. They will respect you because you give it to them straight. 
sao isnt representative of vr at all in the slightest, and the technology depicted will likely never exist, so if its changed your opinion on vr, your opinion isnt about real vr 
I just need to chose the perfect photo, I mean they are all brilliant but I would hate to ruin the pretty white dress of yours x
*laughs* Exactly. 
Actually now that I think about it I don't believe in God. Thanks for the Vita, infinite and ever expanding reality!
why at blast furnace?
Thanks for this
I was worried about healer accuracy when I first saw the Law gear but after thinking about it, its not as bad as people claim  For one, I realized I have a hit rate of about 90% with Ravana Ex (either that or I had crazy RNG in all the runs I did)... Ive heard from other classes it has about the same acc requirement as T13 so it makes no sense  In T13, with 420~ acc I missed all the time, so how is it that here with only 350~ I rarely miss?  It means they must have drastically lowered the healer acc requirements for that fight (so whats stopping them from doing the same for raids?)  Plus, there is the fact they added a really nice accuracy caster food, and bards have a 100% uptime -10% evasion debuff skill to help healers out even further  And of course, we will probably be able to spec our new relics with accuracy if we feel like it  But yeah, cant really tell what its gonna be like until Alexander
Looks like a Murderbox... 
Good lord Desi take a pitch
You're missing my point as well. The 14th amendment states that any services or public utility provided by the government must be given out on a non discriminatory basis. There is no reasonable dissent to allowing same sex couples to marry. Couples who are to old to have children can marry, no one is forced to have children- so marriage is not solely for posterity. All sorts of tradition has been linked to marriage, even here in the US. Claiming to defend the "definition of a word" or a "1000 year old institution" is crap. Me marrying another adult who has agreed to marry literally does not impact your life. Why you think you need to have control over my life is beyond me... "you argue emotional horseshit" lol
if we dont win the nines next year i will remove myself from this plane of existence
/r/ForwardsFromKlandma
Fair enough. You got me a little excited there. Ha
I made it!!!
LW. Flirted with 20 goal seasons a couple of times but has really struggled the last couple seasons and it doesn't look like anything is changing there. Solid defensively though. Most likely a bottom 6 guy at this point in his career
Only for the latest game then.   It took the Kirby franchise 3 games to get their main cast together, and Sakurai actually waved the chance to add his favorite character (Dedede) goodbye in exchange of bolstering the roster with clones back in melee.  
The caulking I need to remove isn't just on the smooth sides of the tub and tile.  It's also on the grout so I can't smoothly scrape it
https://soundcloud.com/v-as-in-virgin/tove-lo-talking-bodies-v-as-in-virgin-bootleg  So I started producing like maybe a year ago. My first couple post were a bit premature, but I've got a better grip on mastering and would like to know what people think of my content so far.
I'm not talking about individuals. My point is that growing up you hear good things about various presidents regardless of the criticisms they faces during their terms.  FDR just happened to be the first example that popped into my head.  
You mean Caitlyn Jenner?
&gt; If we can't celebrate victories we'll never feel like we're getting anywhere.  That's their goal. They get off on being in a perpetual state of feeling victimized on behalf of other people, and in lashing out at an unjust world.   Sort of like how conspiracy theorists will simply incorporate any new information into their conspiracy theory, the types of people you are talking about will just incorporate any new development into their overall victim narrative. 
Agree on Eiken then
In my latest entry of my ["Grumblebear gets old gats from his family"](http://imgur.com/gallery/qhBrr/) series,  my 83-year-old uncle saw it fit to give me his dad's old hunting shotgun, a Remington Sportsman-58. An odd design for sure, but it works (sort of).  Tune in later this week for a write-up on the JC Higgins Model 103.229.
*Die Frauenschaft vs. USWNT
I guess the real mystery is where the downvote button is located... 
I am a righty who turns paper counterclockwise, but find left handed writing looks great. As a teacher, I had seven lefties in my class this year and their cursive was better than the righties!!
How'd it go? Care to give a follow-up?
Why not use the preview build of windows 10 until it actually comes out later this month?
Thought it was a penis ,only a finger 
I dig the use of black and the Bloodshard blade
They must make "have 8K" in Dota2 achievement, millions of people had played for like 10 years and there's one 1 person who actually had 8000 [MMR](http://www.dota2.com/leaderboards/#europe) for few days [proof](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=25Nq6m2qK6Y)
I think the donor fears that the organisation will attempt to use the money to help the kids in the wrong way. I disagree with using hormone injections to suppress puberty in but sometimes this is done. I wouldn't want my money going towards this, that doesn't mean I don't want to help those kids though.
Is this what it's come down to?
Gay at arrival, still gay upon departure.  Roger.
That and the fact that the one place we used to be able to 'hide' players is now a top 30 program who is run by administrators who are openly hostile to the AA. God dammit M Train why did you have to become good???
Why did you apply for a unionized job if you didn't want to pay dues?
That's why I queue auto select. Best possible pick for the team you're placed in
£37m according to Sky  http://www1.skysports.com/football/news/11667/9192993/transfer-news-manchester-united-linked-with-sporting-lisbon-midfielder-william-carvalho
All you and Florida had to do was have a good season in 2014. Unfortunately you picked the wrong time for a down year. 
The U.S. breaks down to 80% service, 19% industry, 1.2% agriculture. So, what is your point?
Try resetting your router
you mean Peter Todd's computer?
Or, alternatively, if it was part of a set display of other historical law codes (Code of Hammurabi, Code of Ur-Nammu, Draconian constitution, Edicts of Ashoka, etc) they would also have a good argument for historical nature.  But by itself? Not so much.
Thanks for the heads up. As you can tell I am new to this, I just need a vehicle that can drive me in the country off-road. Nothing competitive, or extreme.
/r/ofcoursethatsathing
Jet fuel
Well, you have bitchy customers...but you do have customers. Get all the prudes drunk on gluten-free beer and you'll get tipped pretty well. It's worked well in my experience.
just finished it after i was shown fauux's neocities site yesterday.  the aesthetic just really intrigued me, so i decided to see what all the imagery was about.  my brain still feels numb from all the analysis i've read....
Up mbeefy ! This scummbag should be ban forever
Can someone tell me what's happening here? I speak no Arabic.
Lol
Since when? Are you restricted from going out with a cold?  If your statement were true, we wouldn't need flu vaccines and the cold medicine industry would go out of business.  EDIT: I hadn't even considered the flu in this. How many people are killed by the flu every year? It's a far bigger killer than any of those crazy illnesses that people are terrified of.  The flu is very dangerous and immuno-comprimised people are at huge risk during flu season. Do we force everyone who has the flu to stay locked up or do we tell people who would be at risk of dying from the flu to avoid areas where they could be exposed? 
Cool
More than any of these, as an American, what pisses me off most is plumbing.  You need a pro for anything more than a faucet, otherwise you end up with gas fittings, and all sorts of other fittings.  Tapered, G-x/x fractions and headaches.  I'm trying to setup a drop irrigation for my farm right now   *SCREAM*
Then why not say "GBP"?
If you guys found aliens in space, you'd tell me right?
I actually knew a guy who was 4 years above me (my cousin went through UGA's pharmacy school too so I knew some of the folks there before I went) that decided it was a good idea to steal a 1000 count Xanax bottle. Got caught obviously, kicked outta pharmacy school, but had a decent lawyer and didn't get completely fucked. Now he's in medical school and on track to be a doctor.
I actually was talking about this with someone last night because I was playing against Sivir and am a Sivir main.  The real thing they could only seriously nerf on her is her W by giving it less AS when activated. Her E has a high enough cool down and controlled enough mana refund that a W/Q cast will take care of it. Her Q early does little damage and her Q late does the damage it should against squishies. They just nerfed her R by 1-3 seconds anyways so that's down.  Overall, I think shes in a perfectly fine position.
As long as there is blood flow, the body can survive extreme damage.
Don't freak out, your post has not been removed.  This is simply a friendly reminder that due to the lack of ability to verify the legitimacy of what is traded, shinies or events of any kind that have been transferred through Pokebank can only be traded in Bank tag posts. Pokémon only available as generation 4/5 events are Mew, Manaphy, Meloetta, and Genesect.  Please contact the mods if you see anyone attempting to bypass this rule.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/pokemontrades) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Popp should've been given a red after her third foul. She constantly is getting beaten on both ends of the ball and fouls out of frustration.   She's relatively important to the German side, so I'm wondering if their manager risks leaving her in. Since I'm an American, I hope she does, because she WILL get sent off if that behavior continues, even if the referee hasn't been the most consistent.
BeyondLions got 3 in 10 summons. GG
10/10 your my perfect type of woman. So stunning, them eyes get me wet.
I've known many people who joined the military to facilitate getting a college degree or for specialized training and achieved their goals.  In my experience, the intelligent/idiot ratio is no different in the military than in the general population.
My thoughts exactly. The couple was not being disrespectful in their request. And while they did sign a contract, the photographer was quite immature about his response. Choosing not to support gay marriage is their right. They did not know the photographer's stance prior to signing that contract, and I think it is fair for them to cancel because of it. The photographer could have quite simply said "I'm sorry you disagree with my stance, however you signed a binding contract that states that your retainer is non-refundable. I accept that you will no longer be needing my service, and wish you all the best.". Not only that, he states that because of their conversation, he will be donating that money to GLAD. Not because he is so generous, but because they disagreed with his views. It's kind of a slap to the face for them really, when it was completely unnecessary. I find it hypocritical for him to do this because they don't agree with him. His broccoli analogy is poor too. They did not make any demands about ending gay marriage, just that they don't support it. A more accurate analogy would be someone not liking broccoli, then choosing to cancel a dinner reservation at a restaurant that they recently found out now serves broccoli. Don't want to eat at that restaurant now? That's cool. That's your choice. But now I'm going to take that $1500 non-refundable deposit you gave me and I'm going to donate that to the broccoli farmers just to spite you.
Thank you so much for those kind words!   If you don't mind me asking how old are you? I am not experienced enough with DMT to give advice on if age makes a difference but I can definitely say that I had an experience of a lifetime and am grateful I made that leap to try it.  No thank you for reading! It's hella long! hahah
"Hhmm"
Yewbs! Hah 
yep, they lend without regard of the ability of the borrower to ever repay, and American banks were complicit in defying/hiding/warping EU rules on the level of Greek debt.
Uuugggg this bitch
Wasn't "playing" the KO game. Just a person with mental issues who watched a movie where someone got hit by a baseball bat and wanted to try it.
What is this reference?
&gt; Could you IMAGINE getting diagnosed with HIV and then having your government educate you on the disease and then provide life saving medication AND a place to stay???  Could you imagine getting diagnosed with HIV and then being told you'll be imprisoned for months or years?  I think we all know there is a fool-proof solution to stopping any diagnosed HIV case from ever spreading, but it's incompatible with a free society - just like imprisoning those who contract a disease.
BlazBlue CP EX on Vita is getting a physical release in the US.  It was 5GB in Japan, digital-only.  So yeah, 8GB retail cards exist.
So is it just me or are they saying that Federation Force's "chibi" style is going to become the new norm for the Metroid series? I really hope that isn't what they're saying...
Perhaps Iris Heart and Vert victory quotes?
Attack speed slows are slows.
Then Ortiz hit one over the second deck. 
josh koscheck was the man, he was robbed againts GSP but other than that he was real champion material
Very nice air shower
Terminal illness is extremely saddening. I don't know how people deal with it. I mean...fuck man. I wish sketchek all the best.  There's a really slim chance, but I really hope sketchek can somehow recover.
Good thing we won't have to worry about that in METROID PRIME: FEDERATION FORCE. Good thing they're finally cutting out all the fat and finally giving us the Metroid game we've been waiting 30 years for in METROID PRIME: FEDERATION FORCE 
http://gfycat.com/OldAnxiousAuklet
Sorry about potato quality... Here's another angle http://i.imgur.com/iZ3T3dA.jpg
Shelby throwing some filth as long as the Nats don't hit it. 
This is fantastic. I just used the D.E.N.N.I.S system in an amiibo post myself, glad to see more Always Sunny love. 
Just did a $10 monthly donation for the next year.  http://imgur.com/cqJJ67L
I am a female. Seen enough to know.  Also, I have no issue with fake breasts. They are all awesome. Women who decide to undergo the procedure have the right to choose. A lot of my friends have done it. 
Wow cute belly :)
I don't think I got a letter unless my parents got it and just threw it away, or I got it and have since forgotten. I didn't check the mail much as I didn't get much. I believe I did get a call sometime after I graduated HS to see if I had plans. I signed up for the Selective Service at age 22, when I was trying to get a paid internship in a civilian army job and they said I had to sign up. I didn't know about it before that point.
lavaloonion is your best bet. That or lavalooning
You don't have to play it.
&gt; just because I earned more seals than most people.  Wut. Why would you discuss that? Was the hunt over and you shouted "Hey everyone! I got full credit! You didn't! LOL!" ? If that's the case, that's why you're getting abuse. If that's not the case, then I don't understand how and why they know that you earned more than them (my point is I think you kinda asked for it, feel free to correct me if I'm wrong).  Also being threatened of having a baguette shoved in your backside sounds more humorous than anything to me (but I'm French, so maybe that has something to do with it).  All in all though, hunting is very very polarizing, there is a lot of trash-talking going on, on most servers, and it's your choice of partaking in it or not (partaking = saying anything in shout chat after a mark is killed), but if you do (and it sounds like you do), then expect to be trash-talked. Personally I participate in hunts but say nothing, I just grab my popcorn after every hunt because the butthurt is fascinating.
Good luck finding people. Let me know how it went.
About time he had an end product...
Wikipedia says that the engine was derived from an aircraft design.  An engine that weighed 750 lb and made 250 horsepower (the car engine only made 250) would probably not cut it for an aircraft.  For example, a random engine I found from the same time period:  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gnome-Rh%C3%B4ne_14M  This engine has 700 hp and weighs 925 lb, which is more like what you would expect from an aircraft engine.  A good aircraft has at most 8 lbs per horsepower, that engine was 3 lbs per horsepower by itself, which is pretty terrible.  The reason the car only had 250 horsepower is because it was a gigantic car with no power brakes or steering, and wasn't a racecar.  More horsepower would just be dangerous.
Either you wear gauntlets 24/7 or you are a robot, I see no other way to scratch that up so bad.
12:00AM EST
Thanks. I was poking around Unhaggle yesterday and got one of their reports done up, but wasn't sure how reliable they are. In your experience, does their program to get dealers to compete for your business work? I know the dealership we purchased our previous car from is one of their certified dealers. 
Wow.  Do you know if #3 applies for any other states?
We *are* all faking it. It's not like any of us have ever done this before. 
Dare to dream.
All Christians would ascend in the rapture, so the mass disappearance of numerous people would really be something.
No contest.
I want incarnum.  Too bad no one remembers it, or includes it in anything.  I could see it working really well in this system, giving advantage instead of those static bonuses that they were famous for.  Plus since (from what I gather) straight bonus arms/armor are really rare, they could have the opposite shtick of monks, where they work best when they are fully armored/equipped.  If they were going to do a specialization for a class though, I have no clue which would work best to convert it.
Good at: positioning, speed (this is slowing down) Bad at: being consistently effective
FUCK you Latos. 
Made in Tokyo  Pokemon caught my interest  In NYC  ----  NYC Pokemon player! /o/
Awesome thanks 
Meat eaters arguing for eating meat typically don't understand how comparisons or analogies work.
Terry Crewes.  
And I will write those.... never.
If I was in your shoes, I'd have just sat around and asked him to do the work for you, as he's more experienced
The 640, I guess. Or he could get a 1020.
maybe a temporary one? I can't imagine they would want to add a permanent one when they already took out the old one
Upvoted for Archer reference. 
He would assign easy to remember nicknames to the entire clubhouse. 
Season 6 was way too overdone with it 
Great Catholic schools all over the city 
This is beside the point but: duh, why wouldn't Simmons agree that Cousins is better? He freakin loves Boogie. And rightfully so.
I support this 110%
Any good town bike has this?
Came here for shining reference. 
His name is Robert Paulson
Oh, I mixed up comments, Apologies
Original Post: [reddit.com/3botsn](https://reddit.com/3botsn)
peanut butter ice cream, brownies and peanut butter
That's all well and good, but shouldn't the fact that there is a cyclone near QLD **in July** be cause for concern?
Pokemon, or maybe Mario. Hell, I wouldn't mind being in Zelda either.
I bet it's sticky.
Good point, I was under the impression that he was an FBI agent
I must admit, I'm not an active member of the PogoTribe as a community because discussion in comments and posts doesn't feel organic to me, though I'm likely in the minority. You mentioned doing live streams and I think this would be a very interesting way to interact with the community. You could answer comments in real time or live chat with members of the PogoTribe or some combination of both. It seems worth experimenting with. 
Ugly chicken is still more fuckable then a dude.
He must be really confident
Sure man
Environmental factors. The way different cultures in the nation and in bordering nations interact, as well as the variety of cultures. Education and general quality of life as well. That's why you can't say "X does this thing and it works, so Y should do it too".
Korea comes to mind. Yugoslavia, Persian Gulf round 1. Hell, Iraqi Freedom was one of the most lopsided wars in history. The problem is occupation; the US military is amazing at destroying their enemies, but quite shit at occupying their countrymen. 
Ahh yes the good ol' two front war. 50% of the time it never works 
That I was one.  In all seriousness, that they were super caddy and bitchy when they mostly aren't. They're emotional, but estrogen is the bitch really.
What do you know about TRPers? You don't even lift!
Just go to the store man.  Clothes shopping online is difficult because you don't know how the cut of the clothing is going to fit you or how it will look on you until you've actually ordered it.  Depending where you buy from, even places like Amazon, you don't know if what you're getting is actually what was advertised.  Grab a girl, take go to lunch together, get some shopping done.
why would you do an LLLP?  Since LLCs were created, practically NOBODY does an LLLP any more -- the only case I've seen is where it was needed for compliance with laws that pre-date LLCs.
...and almost 70 pitches \#darkclouds
No i'd get really scared drachian =(
Sure they do. Not getting exactly what they want. 
FF?
M9 BAYO FADE FN 95% FADE float:0,018  http://i.imgur.com/NRthzSM.png SS: http://imgur.com/a/3YESW B/O:130k   https://steamcommunity.com/tradeoffer/new/?partner=239840977&amp;token=BSpUC9dc
Actually, "kill the other guy" is not a successful evolutionary adaption.  Why not? 1. 50% of the time the other guys wins 2. It does nothing to get your sperm in the game - and evolution is all about reproduction.   a) Your penis is shaped like a plunger for a reason - it will pull out existing sperm while depositing yours.   b) Men will fuck deeper and shoot sperm deeper when infidelity is suspected   c) Men produce more sperm when infidelity is suspected   d) The sperm produced after infidelity vary from normal sperm - and appear to play a role in preventing insemination   Evolution is all about getting your genes replicated.  The most effective tactic for this is getting turned on when your mate shows signs of infidelity. At the same time, you are evolved to want to prevent cheating behavior - so anger is a likely secondary response.  But since human females have some control over who they mate with, the anger response is inconsistant. Of course human behaviors are complex and driven by many factors other then pure instinct - we are not insects - so individual responses vary greatly - as you experience in yourself. Let me ask you.  Have you been in an exclusive relationship?  Did you ever suspect she was cheating or did you have group sex? Like most guys, I never imagined I would get turned on by cuckolding - until the conditions were ripe.  It was upsetting, confusing and depressing.  
You can get away with it when you're a fucking prince. 
Yes most wanted on top. If you're on phone just add it to your cart in the reverse order of what you want first if that makes any sense.
Hello /u/LEENMACHINE3000,  Thank you for your submission. Unfortunately your account is not yet old enough to post to /r/videos at this time.  We suggest that you wait a while (about a week), while also commenting in some popular threads and submitting links to other subreddits for the time being.  We do this to prevent spammers from abusing /r/videos. We are sorry for any inconvenience caused, and look forward to your submissions in the future.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/videos) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Brainbuster, so he can teach the move to Sami Zayn when he returns
Now you're Max
California and Damen blue line stops. Clarks at Belmont and Sheffield lately too
Crack is an amazing drug my friend...
It's always going to be optional.  I think the post OP is referring to talked about being able to set thresholds for it to auto swap, not as a forced minimum ping to be able to use predictive.
Going really high and jumping off the swings and giving your friends the DX "suck it" sign mid-air was the epitome of being 11 years old.
Not exactly. www.youtube.com/watch?v=GGXzlRoNtHU
i have a buddy who currently works for them as a pilot plant tech with a MS in BioEngineering. I feel that Genentech look into 3rd parties such as Aerotek, etc to make their hires, atleast for the junior level positions. 
I have an edgerouter lite and a Unifi LR  access point at work. It's been great as far as stability goes (it runs for months and months without me having to intervene), and I've managed to config it to do everything I need, but I don't do anything fancy with it (which means that I was able to configure it through their GUI).  It does run a Vyatta fork though, so you can do some pretty fancy stuff with it.  Edit: I think that they do have a model with an antenna, but it's an older product I don't see mentioned much. I don't even know if it runs the same OS as the edgerouter line.
Because fuck you that's why = US Government.
It's not mine but it looks about right: http://farm8.staticflickr.com/7231/7383759806_1b905202ef.jpg
Cats are awesome because they are like roommates who pretty much can take care of themselves. You can go about your normal life and they are just there to chill with you. They are also awesome at helping you calm down. Many panic attacks have been stopped by a fluffy belly pet and purring. Honestly I can't think of a time where my life has been negatively impacted because I have cats. You have pretty much nothing to worry about. 
Hang on, I've completely confused it with another Mayflash product. I remember seeing that Mayflash made a USB adapter that's more or less the same as the official one. The Mayflash adapter I have and mentioned allows you to plug a GameCube controller into a Wii remote so it's recognised as a Classic Controller. Hence why it can used with other games besides Smash.
Asking for clarification of a clause in a lease is not beyond the score of /r/legaladvice.
"The affidavit said."
He turned me off, but hasn't turned me on yet.
Wouldn't conducting the experiment/ knowing the results affect the chance of divorce? 
"About  Actualite.co is an entertainment site , news are created by users. They are humorous news , fantasy , fictitious , that should not be taken seriously or as a source of information !  Find all the news on Actualites.com"
:'(
/u/killerbeege  - was this you?
Just need his goals, or a better defense and half his goals. Not easy but its not as if they dont have a chance at top 4. I actually think they will finish 4th above united. 
will drive 20 mins to Scheveningen ezpz.
Are you Irish? I don't mean to be rude, I'm just trying to figure it out. :) This was very nice! I love the Beatles. You should check out Recordings too and cross-post there
You're still terribly confused about what a tabloid is and what a newspaper is. For your own edification, you'd really benefit from understanding the difference so you don't just throw your hands up and think every article = TMZ. Beyond that, nothing else you just spent time writing has any substance. None. It's just your own conjecture, which I'm sorry, but it has zero worth in terms of the conversation, whereas credible sources (real city newspapers that report diligently on the sport like I provided) does. Speaking of which, I take it you couldn't find anything from more recently than 4 years ago saying he wouldn't play here?   Rather than type a lot of words. Type fewer, but with more credible substance. It will be less of a waste of time for all parties involved.
How much does it cost?
Yep, they never seem to miss...
'witness' can just mean a person who presents information or testimony about something. it doesn't necessarily mean they saw something, that would be an eye-witness.
Yeah but I don't think lying is your only problem here bud.  If I was your gf, even reading this would make me sad. "My gf is thin and has really small boobs. Charlie is curvy with big boobs." You talk about your girlfriend like she's nothing and Charlie like you still love her.  Either keep Charlie and dump your gf, or get rid of Charlie and keep your gf, that is, if she's nice enough to stay.  Don't try to compromise between the two because you wont be able to nor should you. Charlie and your girlfriend do not need to exist in the same world.
Alternatively, just happy to see their friend getting married.
It's going to happen whether you report people to the FAA like a good little Stasi informant or not.  There have already been at least two deaths that I am aware of, one as a result of an accident at a Jets football game and one kid in a park who lost control of his Evil Deathcopter.  Meanwhile, by encouraging reporting, you enable people like this lovely young womyn:  http://www.forbes.com/sites/gregorymcneal/2014/07/14/woman-assaults-minor-over-a-drone-gets-mere-probation/
It is always this way. If you want the territory you have to start from your own land, sea invade, or para-drop troops in.
Invited
1. its not slaying  2. people not doing what they do and instead grinding 90+ stats before doing fun stuff is what makes this game empty in comparison to how rs2 was.
**Episode 3**: Yes, it's a sad story. C'mon! What was the joke? Naked girl? Typical mc response. We get to hear Chihiro's the joke! Didn't laugh. Well, at least she's considerate. Drawing manga all night and still goes to school? Seems like a dangerous place for a nap. Why are there no fences or something? "I stayed up all night, so I can't eat that much." I would've thought the exact opposite. You use more energy staying awake than sleeping. Oh that lewd yuri. Is this anime like three separate storylines that all tie together? I think taking a shot of a dream is pretty hard. Why is Kei glowing? Oh snap, get caught... I guess. That artwork in the end was pretty nice.   ___ So, apparently won't be making many gifs mainly because it takes forever with this 1080p source (5 gifs in ~2 hours yesterday).
D'awww, thanks.
What server? If EUNE then hit me up
yeah, the futuristic paintings that show people as the same in gritty surroundings, but with the high tech stuff around them. That's what makes the really good art.
But how do they reveal it if it's all theory??
I could have written better quests and dailies with storyboards for cinematics on my lunch break.  This is awful.
Obviously it is. WHM's healing power is still insane. TBH I find healing with WHM fairly boring simply because there's no real challenge behind it. With AST however I feel like I'm forced to play the job I'm supposed to, which I like.
So that's what it's called. TIL
Bad people and evil people are different
Mike Evans. Say what u want but Vjax is getting paid 12 mill a year for a reason . Evans will surpass him soon though  Edit * to clarify Evans had a nice rookie year . Broke team records but has to prove to be consistent. 
I fucking love onions, and eat them with just about anything that isn't stupid.  I make AMAZING fried egg sandwiches using a load of onions. They could be the greatest things ever.
Probably doesn't know the difference
Gordon leads the NL in hits.
That is genius.
Personne se plaint? Wtf /r/Quebec !!
Or 2 Talent of the Telepaths into 4 Time Stretches :p
Alright you crazy ladies and gentlemen.  This game is 5-0.  Let's not forget that.
There was U2, and Blondie, With music still on MTV
Ah I see what you did there.
Step 1: Buy game before it's finished. Step 2: Get exactly what you paid for. Step 3: Complain.  The fuck did you think was going to happen?
Do you use any writing software? I have several, but i prefer writing on Metapad and FocusWriter. What are you writing?
Lua isn't exactly hard to beat in any aspect.
Obviously this is true.  If being gay was socially acceptable and totally normally... think of all the republicans who would be gay.  There's obviously a lot of self hate feeding the amount of time they spend thinking about what other people are doing and trying to get other people to buy into their demonizing of gays.  Straight people just don't care if other people are gay or if gay people are getting married.
I'd go with Super Mario Bros U because it's cheaper... especially if you get the one bundled with Luigi U since you get 2 games in 1 (They don't seem to sell the bundled game as new in the US though but in Asia, it's available in retail for US Wii Us).
It definitely works on the Brahmin in Megaton, for example.
I could barely watch the first season alone, definitely never put it on past 9pm. 
It for sure doesn't have to be niche, and I would enjoy seeing the game becoming larger very much, but unless I'm mistaken (and I would hope to be in this matter), PGI isn't really getting MWO's name out there really.  Hell, Fallout is the earliest example of a game that I can think of that had "modular" (your limbs) HP, though you don't die in MWO when you lose both your arms and a leg due to lots of damage. Limbs make the game at least more interesting because it's much harder overall to null someone from being a threat than many of the other FPSs out there.  I don't think I'd say the biggest failure of MWO monetarily is the pricing so much as the associated value of the product. In LoL, a skin might be $13ish, but if it's on a champ you enjoy playing a lot or really enjoy, it'd be worth the value (especially if you play that champ a lot!). MWO customization options aren't at that associated value point yet. People joke about Atlas Truck Nuts, but I bet that people would buy similar cosmetic items if they could, and if they felt that it wouldn't be a waste of the item. That's a fair reason why I don't buy cockpit items: I'll forget them in one mech, and then totally forget about them
Ooooh I'm sorry, that's incorrect. But thanks for playing 
I hope Hinakami will become a mainstay of the manga. Maybe Yuu's new GF.
Read it twice a year. Great read.  Also The Magic of thinking big.
Subscribe: /Rantarian
Oh cool!  The red car gets pulled over, too!
wow audrey is throwing clay under the bus
I actually think bombers are pretty good against SMG tanks now, as long as they stay far away. It used to be a lot worse (SMG's did full damage and had perfect accuracy at infinite range when burst firing. They were the perfect anti-air and flyers just weren't viable). While the noise and flashes may make it seem like you're getting ripped apart, the actual damage they do at that range is pretty weak, while your plasma is still effective.  But that's at T10 and level 100. I can imagine your planes aren't optimal yet as you're still leveling and maybe learning.  But yeah, the "dull, skill-less fights" are what I think a damage reduction may be able to solve, as it gives room for options during a fight. 
The 500 mbps is the maximum speed over the whole PowerLine network in your home. Most PowerLine adapters only have 100mbps on the ethernet side. So, that means, you could theoretically plug 5 devices in your home all with 100mbps ethernet an full capacity.
10?! i just started -_- so 1. discount for debit?
It's always an option. 
tl;dr they complain about Barbara Gordon being killed, even though if you finish the game it turns out she wasnt
That's even better. 
First things first size up your opponent. Who has the longer arms and legs, who has the broader build and who is generally taller and bigger?  This will inform you where you want to be in this fight.  If you have the longer arms then you want to stay outside their reach and hit them. Your job is to not let them get close.    If you have the shorter arms you want to get inside his reach and plant your feet then hook your punches to the ribs.  To hook a punch push off your back leg and twist your ribs while throwing your fists with your arms bent. Best I can describe it.  If he has longer legs he can kick you, but odds are he isn't wearing clothes that make kicks easy. If he throws a lazy kick and its slow. Grab his leg and swing him around and throw him. Ideally into a wall. Then kick him the face before he gets up.    If he has long legs and can kick you. Get inside. Works the same.  Don't throw kicks yourself.      If he is bigger than you build wise don't let him grab you or get on top. Big guys do a lot of damage.   If you are big get a hold of him and sit on him.   Punch him a lot once you're in control.     If he has long arms, big build and hes tall you want to be no where near him.     Size doesn't make you a good fighter, but if he is you don't want to risk it. They don't separate lightweights and heavyweight to protect the lightweight.   If in doubt stick your thumb into their eye or bite a lump out of them.   
T
Pssshhh..new Korean Zerg meta is best meta.   You're just jealous.
Just had flashbacks to when /r/atheism was a default...
Neither do I but I still got the gist of what he was saying.
I actually see the card as being extremely strong, but it doesn't accomplish enough immediately. It's broken in a good arena deck. It can only be countered by the synergy and burst found in high level constructed decks killing off the wielder before using all of the charges. It's not a weak card, it's an unhealthy card. It's like how Kel'Thuzad or Jaraxxus works: insane ability that can give infinite value/damage, but slow enough or situational enough that you could just lose before you can fully utilize it. Thus, one can simply limit the extent it can be utilized (as players would never survive that long anyway), and make it a fast enough card to help in turning a game around. Adding a Deathrattle would just further milk the value over time and would do nothing in speeding up the card.
I really don't mean this the way it sounds, but holy crap it sucks to be you.   I can't imagine how hard life is with that kind of metal sensitivity. How bad are the hives? Do they go away quickly or does it take you down for the rest of the day if you're not careful?
Beat you by 2 minutes :)   THanks!!!
"I haven't had the chance to test most of this[...]" This is just hilarious. You're not even half as tough as you've deluded yourself into believing. Don't think "lashing out" at people for minor things is something to be proud of.
Annabelle. The trailer made it look like a crappy collection of jump scares and *"OH IT'S A SPOOKY DOLL"* imagery, yet it *did* deliver on several occasions, and they didn't overplay Annabelle's presence too much. I will say it was heavily flawed, but I was expecting maybe 4/10 material, and ended up giving it a 7.
http://imgur.com/A06sIEi here you go! 24x36!
That's why they have to hang the men before due process starts: All these "innocent" verdicts are messing with their narrative. If they'd just get lynched before a court hearing happens like good men (the best man is a dead one, after all), then we could finally finish with a society that's good: Women, and the actual villainous men that simply kill those who might endanger them. A perfect, functional society where a moral of "kill on sight" is the go-to rule. Extinction within one generation. That's the dream.
SOMETIMES it's safer to assume we are. Because it can be hard to tell. I wouldn't give all men the benefit of the doubt.  I think many people who don't meet their true love early on, learn that dating/relationships are a great way to learn about how horrible people can be and how you manage your own decision making skills.
I don't know who this David Roberts guy is but he sure does have some fresh nuts! 
Absol is so elegant and I really like the lore behind it. Plus, its mega form is absolutely beautiful with a  great stat spread.
absolutely useless to gaming industry,
...and then he tagged the new "bf" in it?  what is he trying to accomplish, besides getting his ass kicked?
Hey now, don't go taking my ruby gems or node modules away. At least those things work with upstream git repos. So I can actually get the version of the library I need to stop my code lighting on fire.  And if you haven't gone through the process of trying to release software for Ubuntu before let me tell you it's a baroque PPA nightmare from an age before git.
I know you didn't want this to be about opinions and whatever but Fireball is in no way a horrible ability, Fire Blast is definitely Ember's ability that needs massive changes.
Well then we can definitely rule you out of potato status. The tiny dick thing is between you &amp; yr maker. 
Enjoy your Ditto /u/goodgoodra!
One mountain top, many paths...
Is it me or is JV getting squeezed? 
I used to love to wake up early in the morning to watch whatever game was being covered by Ian Darke and Steve Mcmanaman. They could commentate on some random game with two lower table teams and they would make that game much more enjoyable. 
https://np.reddit.com/r/skeptic/comments/294k95/compilation_of_scientific_literature_that/
Have you restarted your client since this began happening?  I was having trouble placing a foundation due to an invisible tree, I finally realized it was a de-sync between my client and server. Client thought there was tree, server thought no tree.  Otherwise, it may just be the bug where rocks aren't rendering for you.
What kind of 90s? Any chance of early Belle and Sebastian? 
Ugh. 
It's out now. Go to PS Store. New Releases, add-on's... it's there for $14.99
Fuck it. Go outside.
The second half could get hairy. They started getting a little rough towards the end of the first. 
This says you've been a Redditor for two years. If you've been around that long, you've seen this before. 
/r/SandersForPresident
2 liter bottles of semen wanted for questioning.
Your post has been removed automatically because all images and short videos, except for infographics, must be submitted in text posts.  If you submitted an infographic, please message the mods by [clicking here](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fleagueoflegends), otherwise [click here](http://reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/submit?selftext=true) to resubmit your image the proper format.  If you're not familiar with the subreddit rules, you can read them [here](http://reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/w/subredditrules).   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/leagueoflegends) if you have any questions or concerns.*
[i used googly magic](http://imgur.com/KPOp7WR)
Subscribe: /Notcher_Bizniz
But the CMV isn't about who wins in a firefight, it's about whether they work to protect against tyranny. If the presence of guns changed the dynamic such that no brutality or oppression actually occurred, then they effectively deterred it, regardless of which way the fight would've gone if shots had been fired. Do you really think that the officers in that first picture of the ranch standoff I posted would've been restrained and peaceful without the big group of armed rednecks a few hundred yards out of the frame?  Sometimes to keep from being bullied you have to make the bully realize that even if he wins the fight, he's not walking away unhurt.
Choose a side under your systems panel (right panel) in the functions tab.  You'll receive combat bonds for kill enemies in a CZ.  You receive merits for killing enemies in a Military Strike.
I kinda want to break out my saxophone again
**Your rating is: 5**   **Pros**   Great natural beauty.  Love your facial structure, lips, nose.   Nice hair.  It looks died but it suits you well.   Tight body.   You look confident. **Cons** Tattoos.  Ugh.   Nose ring.  Ugh again.   Way too much makeup.  You're very naturally pretty, but you insist on destroying that with the tattoos, piercings, and makeup.  
[Top priority even according to the Guardian](http://www.theguardian.com/football/2015/may/16/paul-pogba-david-de-gea-louis-van-gaal-manchester-united?CMP=share_btn_tw) , article is about a 2 months old but that was probably the time when they made the shortlist, we might still be interested but we might not be. If we are still interested and are willing to pay his price, I think we have a decent position to sign him, our club has a lot of potential because of the money and Louis van Gaal, he's familliar with the club and still 'loves' us. 
Error 403 when I go to play beats 1 😕 what is this??
